Title
Review for American History X (1998)
Number of Reviews
28

Author
Brandon Herring 
Starring: Edward Norton, Edward Furlong, Beverly D'Angelo, Fairuza Balk.
Rated R for graphic violence and language, strong sexuality and nudity.
"American History X" is one of the most powerful, most involving movies I have
seen in a while. The whole movie is simply amazing, shooting off the center
minor times but quickly picking up where it left off. I think Edward Norton's
performance in this movie is one of the best performances in a movie to me on
record. He gets into his character so deep, he believes what the character is
doing. After a while we start to believe him, it's absolutely incredible. The
supporting cast more than supports Edward, they almost do just as great of job
as he does. The rest of the cast includes Edward Furlong, Beverly D'Angelo and
Fairuza Balk.
The movie starts out with some guys trying to break into Derek's (Edward
Nortan) car. His younger brother Danny (Edward Furlong) walks in during him and
his girlfriend having sex to tell him someone is robbing his car. Derek gets up
quickly, grabs his gun and shoots the three guys outside. The police come and
Derek is put in jail for three years. Derek is also a neo-natzi skinhead.
Before all this happened he had a group of other skinheads, meetings and
robberies. 
Danny having seen what happened, wants to follow in his brother's footsteps and
he too becomes a skinhead. His grades in school start to drop, he hangs out
with the wrong crowd and does other misc. stuff. Three years later Derek gets
out of prison. A changed man no longer a skinhead, but a person who respects
other people. Danny learns that when Derek was in prison, he was partnered with
a black man to do jobs and found out, there is no reason to hate these people.
Now years before Danny and Derek's father was killed by a drug dealer while
fighting a fire. Since then Derek has been a skinhead. His mother played
superbly by Beverly D'Angelo can not understand where she went wrong. Her other
three kids are not like that. Derek a changed man, no longer a nazi has to
fight his past when he returns, and fight the people from his past to change
his brother into a regular person.
'American History X' is definately one of 1998's best films. It has superb
acting to go along with it's excellent storyling. It's extremely believeable in
all senses, very very powerful and emotionally involving. We actually live the
lives the characters live. We are there right beside them the whole time
through the rough times and the good times. When the ending comes we are
shattered but left with a good message. 
Now the whole movie is nothing but a message. It deals with race and how we
shouldn't base someone precisely on the color of their skin, but what they are
inside. Edward Furlong gives a performance that is not only great, but his
character is really the star of the film. It's the story through his eyes, what
he sees, and what he doesn't see. If you want to see a movie that will disturb
you while making you cry, see 'American History X' it's one of the best films
made.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring August 29, 1999.
Brandon Herring
Movie Review Heaven
(http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Author
Matt Williams
American History X is a powerful examination of the destructive allure
of racism and hatred.  Bolstered by some impressive performances, paints
a vivid picture of how mindless hatred can tear society, and an
individual family, apart.
Derek Vinyard (Edward Norton) is the perfect skinhead poster boy: he's
handsome, charismatic, athletic, smart, and full of hatred.  As a youth,
he teamed up with a local white supremacist, Cameron Alexander (Stacy
Keach), and organized a powerful skinhead gang in Venice Beach.
However, after committing murder in an ideologically racist zeal, Derek
is sent to prison.  While there, he reevaluates his life, and years
later, returns home a changed man.
What he finds there frightens him.  His young brother, Danny (Edward
Furlong), idolizes him, and has followed in his footsteps.  Danny has
become a virulent skinhead, even turning in a school book report on Mein
Kampf.  Derek's must struggle to reclaim his brother from the same
depths of hatred which ruined his own life.
The heart of this movie is Edward Norton, and he delivers a powerful
performance.  It's a gutsy move to make his initially racist character
so compelling to begin with.  There's even a point where the movie gets
seductively close to endorsing the "white power" platform.  However,
soon the bottom drops off into a well of self-destructive hatred.
Norton is able to show the full evolution of his character, from the
innocent, to the hate-filled youth, to the regretful adult...all with a
believable intensity.
Many of the actors in the supporting cast are excellent as well. Avery
Brooks portrays a passionate high school principal who's not willing to
give up on his misguided students.  Edward Furlong gives a layered
performance as Danny, much better than his one-note sappiness in
Pecker... perhaps there's a good actor in there after all.
Director Tony Kaye (who wanted his name taken off this film due to
editorial differences) also served as the film's cinematographer, and
there his talents truly shined.  From the film's effective use of black
and white flashback sequences, to a well-handled slow-motion water
motif, the film is always visually stimulating.
The overall message of the film might smack a bit of self-importance
(particularly when considering the film's conclusion).  However,
although a few excesses are made, the film does have a deserving
message, which it effectively delivers.
American History X is a moving and involving film, tackling the tough
subject of racism in America, displaying its causes and allures, as well
as its ultimate senselessness.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Author
Heather Picker
     Directed by Tony Kaye. Written by David McKenna. Starring Edward Norton,
with Edward Furlong, Avery Brooks, and Stacy Keach. 1998, 119 min., Rated R.
     "American History X" gained publicity when director Tony Kaye publicly
denounced the version that was going to be distributed. He wanted his name to
be removed, and 'Humpty Dumpty' put in it's place, claiming that the film's
star, Edward Norton ("Primal Fear," "Rounders"), had re-edited it to give
himself more screen time. Ultimately, the movie would gain more publicity when
Norton garnered an Academy Award nomination for Best Actor. His performance is
truly stirring; the saving grace of a story with tremendous potential because
of it's social relevance, but one that fails to rise above average.
     Daniel Vinyard (Edward Furlong, "Pecker") is a high school student who
turned in a report about Hitler's "Mien Kampf." His alarmed teacher takes the
paper to Principal Sweeney (Avery Brooks), who calls Daniel into his office and
tells him that from now on he will report to Sweeney for a class called
American History X. By the next morning Daniel must have turned in to him a new
report, this time about his older brother, Derek (Norton). Earlier in the day,
Derek had been released from prison after doing time for killing two young
black men whom he'd caught breaking into his car a few years ago.
     Daniel arrives home and we're given a more formal introduction to his
apparently racist background. His mother Doris (Beverly D'Angelo), sister
Davina (Jennifer Lien), and younger sister, are fawning over Derek. The
brother's hug and Daniel shows Derek a white power tattoo. Derek wants to know
when he got it, and doesn't seem pleased. Seth (Ethan Suplee), the token
hulking idiot of their circle of acquaintances, arrives, and he, too, is given
an inexplicably chilly reception by Derek, who obviously has other things on
his mind.
     As Daniel writes his report, black and white flashbacks of what happened
the night Derek was arrested begin. The flashbacks comprise a large part of the
one-minute less than two hour running time of the movie. Derek's mysterious
behavior continues when he tells Daniel not to go the party that is being
thrown that night for the white supremacist group at the home of Cameron
Alexander (Stacy Keach). Of course, Daniel goes anyway, and is shocked and
feeling betrayed when Derek has a private confrontation with Cameron that
escalates into Seth pointing a gun at Derek, who runs from the angry group that
had, just moments earlier, been proclaiming him a hero for having killed the
would-be burglars.
     When Daniel catches up with him, we're treated to some more flashbacks
that attempt to more fully explain Derek's change of heart. Turns out,
unsurprisingly, that he wasn't as big a hit in the slammer as he had been with
the groups he used to cheer into frenzied race-motivated attacks by simply
standing on his soapbox and being the rhetorical ringmaster to a bunch of
misguided teens. He was a recruiter and did Cameron's dirty work, something he
didn't realize until his stint in jail, during which he was raped and became
close friends with his secret protector, Lamont (played terrifically by Guy
Torry). All of this opened up his eyes, and he turned to Sweeney, who had once
been a man he greatly respected, for help.
     When Derek is through telling Daniel about what 'changed' him, the flaws
in the story become more noticeable, mainly because Daniel is so willing to
accepting of Derek's reasons, and himself reforms. The next morning, Derek has
an appointment with his parole officer, and is eager to get his life back on
track by obtaining his old job position, and he stops with Daniel, who is on
his way to school, to get a cup of coffee. Sweeney and a police officer show
up, in need of Derek's help. Cameron had been beaten badly the night before,
and they need Derek to get to the bottom of things. Derek reluctantly agrees,
telling Sweeney, "You're going to get me killed by a bunch of white boys."
     Foreshadowing has been evident up to this point, with Derek looking a bit
ill at ease before he even entered the coffee shop. But as he sees Daniel off
in front of the school building, the impending sense of doom is palpable. If
this synopsis seems short, let me assure you that it basically covers the
entire film, except for a short incident at the beginning that is pertinent to
the ending, I left it out because it would definitely be a spoiler. Even so,
considering the running time not very much happens. The 'present-time' actions
occur in color and within a very short (24 hour) time frame, and the
flashbacks, tastefully done in black and white, span from Derek's high school
years to his final day in prison.
     Furlong is solid as Daniel, but it is the amazing performance of Norton
that keeps "American History X" from lapsing into a tired story. The biggest
fault of the script is that believable reason for what led to the racist views
and actions of the Vinyard boys is never explained. Instead, an ill-conceived
dinner table scene has their murdered father, Dennis (William Russ of TV's "Boy
Meets World") explain "affirmative black-tion" to Derek, who had just told the
family about Sweeney, a double Ph.D. holder and great teacher, who was having
the class read "Native Son." What Dennis said, and how Derek had been portrayed
as up to that point, don't come close to adding up to the hate Derek harbored
towards non-Aryans.
     Lacking motivation, the characters wouldn't be believable at all if not
for the acting. Furlong gives his Daniel a depth that, while really only
extending towards trust, admiration, but also residual pain from the horror of
what he witnessed his fallen-hero older brother do to the intruders on the
night of the murders. And Norton's often chilling performance provides one of
the scariest cinematic scenes in recent memory; that of Derek's look of triumph
as he is arrested after the killings. Additional cliched characters include
Stacey (Fairuza Balk), Derek's ex-girlfriend, Murray (Elliott Gould), the
teacher from the beginning and an ex-boyfriend of the equally cliched ill
Doris, and the liberal sister (Lien). The supporting cast does what they can
with their underdeveloped roles. D'Angelo, Brooks, Torry, and Suplee in
particular, but the real supporting standout is Stacy Keach as the disgustingly
cowardly bigot Cameron.
     The most frighteningly realistic aspect of the story is that, while it
never convinces us why the main character(s) joined the neo-Nazis, it is very
convincing in it's depiction of insecure teens who feel a need to belong, and
find that sense of belonging in unabashed hatred. Charismatic recruiter Derek
isn't the kind of Bible-thumping Grand Dragon that appears on cheap talk shows,
he is a poised, passionate, and fervently articulate and captivating speaker.
Even those who disagree with his ideas listen, though incredulously, and are,
like Murray in a flashback scene, still resigned to the fact that nothing can
be done about it.
     In spite of the lackluster script (which admittedly may have come across
as a bad story because of the editing. Unless the Kaye-approved version is over
released, that may never be known), "American History X" is an engrossing film
that deserves to be seen. After seeing this, I'm looking forward to seeing
future work of director Kaye, who first made a name for himself directing
commercials. He also served as cinematographer, with impressive results. Shots
that are alternately stylish and gritty add a realistic touch that is otherwise
only visible through the performance of Norton.
     Brought to DVD by the New Line folks, renowned for their excellent
Platinum Series, of which "American History X" is not a part, the disc is, as
expected, an excellent package. The picture quality, for both the color and
black and white sequences, is crisp and clear. Presented only in widescreen,
also enhanced for 16x9 (widescreen) televisions, and in it's original 1.85:1
aspect ratio, it is another great transfer from New Line. The sound is also
very good (5.1 Surround or Surround). The supplements include, beside the usual
interactive menus, three deleted scenes (two are about a minute or less and
fairly inconsequential, another scene which explains what happened to Cameron
runs about five minutes long), the original theatrical trailer (widescreen),
and biographies and filmographies of the cast and crew.
     Notes: Rated R for graphic brutal violence, pervasive language, nudity,
and sexuality.
     DVD Details: Snap case.  Widescreen (16x9 enhanced) featuring three
deleted scenes, the original theatrical trailer, and cast and crew biographies
and filmographies.
     The Verdict: "American History X" is a stirring drama, and marks the
beginning of a promising career on behalf of director Tony Kaye. The story is
uneven, but Edward Norton's brilliant portrayal of a young neo-Nazi who's time
in prison forces him to reevaluate where hatred has gotten him in life is
reason enough to view this film. For optimum picture and sound quality, the DVD
is very highly recommended.
mailto: Ahber16@aol.com
Review courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Author
Jeffrey Huston
Rated R
(for excessive strong language, strong sexuality, nudity,
and graphic brutal violence including a prison rape scene)
Directed by Tony Kaye. Produced by John Morrissey. Screenplay by David
McKenna. Distributed by New Line Cinema. Running time: 118 minutes.
Release date: October 30, 1998 in limited release; wide November 20th.
(to read this review complete with pictures from the film, visit's Jeffrey
Huston's site at:
http://www.impactprod.org/people/huston/americanhistoryx.htm )
I've lived up and down the Midwest, a.k.a. "The American Heartland", all of
my life. Although I have interacted with different races throughout my life,
I have never been around or confronted by issues of racism. Racial hatred
and injustice was something I saw in the paper or reported on the evening
news.
That isn't to say that I haven't lived around or interacted with different
races; I have. Chalk it up to blessed surroundings or naiveté, but wherever
I've lived, races have intermingled with warm friendship and equal respect.
In some segments of our society, however, racism is alive and well.
Even though there are rural elements of bigotry like the KKK, the majority
of racial tension and aggression in contemporary America is taking place in
our nation's inner cities. I've never seen this life and culture first-hand.
I've never fully witnessed the racist extremes of both blacks and whites. I'
ve never been to these subcultures of anger, hatred, and violence. "American
History X" brought me there.
"American History X" is the story Derek Vinyard (Edward Norton), a smart
young man who is corrupted by hatred of anything or anybody that isn't
Caucasian. After   committing a brutal crime of violence under the guise of
self-defense, Derek lands in jail. This begins a personal journey for Derek
Vinyard, one that forces him to confront his venomous hatred and racist
beliefs and see them for the lies that they really are.
First time feature director Tony Kaye and screenwriter David McKenna have
created a very powerful story here, with much of the dramatic evolution
coming from the way in which they structured the story itself. The events of
"American History X" are not told chronologically. Rather, the story goes
back and forth between the present and the past. In doing this, the story
continues to grab our attention as it slowly develops and reveals the
dimensions of each of its characters, particularly Derek.
I love films that do this because they don't show all of their cards up
front. We see each character act a certain way in the first part of the
story, but only through the course of the film do we slowly come to realize
why they have become the way that they are. It is also a precarious balance
to continue to go backwards and forwards in time, but credit Kaye and
McKenna for always making it clear and seamless.
One of the ways this is accomplished is that Kaye filmed every event from
the past in black and white. But when we return to the present, everything
is in color. Not only is this a good artistic way to express symbolism, but
it is also an effective method to use when telling a story in a non-linear
sequence.
By seeing either color or black and white, we immediately know two things:
A -- when the particular scene is taking place. B  the psychological,
mental, and emotional state of each character. This aids the viewer in
helping them to easily switch back and forth between the different emotional
perspectives that each time period depicts.
Most films that broach the issue of racism are afraid to confront the
complexities that the subject possesses. It's rather brave indeed to have a
main character back up his opinions with statistics and facts that are hard
to refute. Granted, Derek's philosophical conclusions to these facts (as wel
l as his solutions to them) are horrifically wrong and come from a
destructive motivation. But most movies depict neo-Nazi Skinheads as
brainwashed rednecks with no intellect or reasoning. And whereas many of the
Skinheads in this film are exactly that, Derek is much more complex.
Many of the Skinheads get some sort of perverted fun out of being
hate-mongering fascists, but Vinyard takes it very seriously. There is more
than senseless hatred involved; Derek has been hurt and destroyed by certain
elements of society. Empowered with great intelligence, he uses his
intellect to distort complex issues into misguided racist opinions.
"American History X" is able to maintain the correct moral perspective while
challenging us in a very politically incorrect yet honest way.
"American History X" has a stellar cast, led with a powerhouse performance
by Edward Norton ("Primal Fear", "Rounders"). Over the last two years,
Norton has never failed to impress. But his portrayal of Derek Vinyard is
the best of his career. Having beefed up for the role, Norton embodies the
role of an embittered young man who sees hatred and violence as the only
solution to society's ills. We never sympathize with Derek in his racist
incarnation, but we do understand him.
This is a phenomenal job of characterization by Norton as he is able to
humanize Derek without taking it to a level of empathy. It is a responsible
acting effort, one where sympathy is eventually evoked but not to the extent
of absolving responsibility for Derek's actions. With this performance,
Norton emerges as one of the very best actors working in film today. Be very
surprised if he is not recognized with an Oscar nomination next February.
Up until now, I have not been a fan of Edward Furlong ("Terminator 2:
Judgment Day"). Most of the characters he has played have been
one-dimensional rebellious punks. He's still a punk in this film, but the
difference is that Furlong's Danny Vinyard is a fully developed,
three-dimensional person. As Derek's hero-worshipping younger brother Danny,
Furlong delivers a sad, poignant performance of a young impressionable kid
caught in racism's crossfire.
Danny shows as much scholastic promise as Derek did, but sells himself short
as he struggles to live a life according to how he thinks Derek wants him to
live it. Having idolized Derek for most of his life, Danny's world is turned
upside down when Derek denounces his racist past. Furlong's vulnerability
allows us to see the upheaval that Danny experiences.
Beverly D'Angelo is impressive as a mother destroyed by her family's hatred.
Stacey Keach offers a subtle evil as Cameron, Derek's facist mentor and
organizer of the Skinhead faction.  Avery Brooks provides the film's moral
center as an African-American teacher who refuses to give up on Derek and
Danny. But it is comedian Guy Torry who provides the film's greatest
surprise as Derek's fellow prison inmate Lamont. Torry's performance is both
overtly funny and quietly direct. Through Lamont, Derek is finally able to
see an African-Americans as a real person for the first time.
It is also through Lamont that one of the film's central themes is
communicated. While many people of color (as well as Caucasians) are serving
appropriate jail sentences, there are those who are victims of the system.
Lamont is one of those victims. And as much as we may not want to face this
particular cancer that appears from time to time in our judicial process, it
is something we must be willing to face if we are to honestly address the
racial injustices that come into play from time to time.
Director Tony Kaye also serves as the film's cinematographer. As one of the
most respected commercial directors of the last decade, he has made a name
for himself with creative visuals. His talent is very apparent here as he
unintentionally establishes himself as the dramatic John Woo. Kaye, like
Woo, has a penchant for slow motion. But like Woo, Kaye's use of this effect
always seems to fit.
The main thing that impressed me was Kaye's fearless use of the close-up. I
am a big fan of close-ups and believe that directors don't use them nearly
enough. Kaye does in this film, allowing us to peer into each characters
eyes and give us a sense of what they are really feeling. Kaye has the
high-quality acting talent that enables him to do this. Wisely, he takes
advantage of it.
Be warned: "American History X" contains very graphic content throughout the
film. From constant profanities to sexual content, as well as brutally
graphic violence including a male rape in prison, this film is extremely
disturbing to watch. While the message of the film is timely and important,
there will be those who simply can't take the package in which it is
delivered. If these elements sound troublesome, you may need to carefully
consider your decision to see this film.
If "American History X" has a flaw, it comes in some of the plot elements
that it asks us to accept and believe to be possible. Derek is given a scant
three years in prison for the two murders he commits. Granted, the thieves
he gunned down were carrying guns themselves. As a result, Vinyard's charges
of murder are reduced to manslaughter via self-defense. This might happen
for your average Joe, but for a Swastika-brandishing Skinhead who
excessively brutalized one of his victims, it seems too lenient.
Also, the film tries to resolve a couple of its issues and characters too
quickly (roughly a day and a half time period within the film). This seems a
little forced given that the hatred and bigotry has been built up over many
years. But having said that, I credit "American History X" for not tying
this film up in a pretty bow. If anything, the story does not allow the
characters to escape their past even when they may want it to simply go
away. Powerfully and tragically, this film shows the reality of reaping the
harvest of evil seeds sewn, even when you've repented and changed.
But for me, these criticisms are minor because they had a minimal negative
affect (if any at all) on me. In spite of these stretches in realism, the
film never loses its power. It will anger you, move you, shock you, and
change you. It will also stay with you. "American History X" is one of the
best films of 1998. It is a film sure to cause debate, controversy and
discussion. If you can stomach the graphic nature of the film, you will
witness the most honest depiction of modern American racism since Spike Lee'
s "Do the Right Thing". It's a tough, sometimes sickening journey, but one
well worth taking.
If you would like to read other film reviews by Jeffrey Huston, visit his
film review site "Believe Me" at:
http://www.impactprod.org/people/huston/core.htm

Author
Pierce Dalton
 American History X is one history lesson I enjoyed.
 I have never been a big history fan.  Yet X displays its history of skinheads
in a powerful, haunting tale of hate vs. love.
 Derek Vinyard (Edward Norton) is sent to jail after he kills a black man in
his neighborhood after Derek catches him trying to steal his car in southern
California.
 With a tatooed Swatstika on his left peck, Derek is the image of hate,
specifically the hate of different races, color.
 But, while in jail, he learns the error of his ways.  Maybe this Derek isn't
the bad-ass he pretends (he thinks) to be. 
 And, I'm sure it helps when Derek is raped in prison by a bunch of white
inmates he befriended.
 The title of the film is the title of a school assignment given to Derek's
little brother, Danny (Edward Furlong).  He must report why it is wrong to say
Hitlar was, well, a good guy, so to speak.
 The moral point of X is, or course, that being a racist is wrong.  Yet,
Norton's acting in this movie are very good, his best to date, I think.  His
Derek is an evil, scary man who's morals are a screwed up as Hitlar's.
 He makes his psychotic character in Primal Fear (1996) look reasonible.
 The rest of the cast, including Beverly D'Angelo and Fairuza Bulk, are, also,
good.

Author
Harvey S. Karten
   The recent torture-murder of Matthew Shepard simply
because the young man was gay helps give "American
History X" a particular timeliness.  But then, hatred and
bigotry have always caused the acting-out of humankind's
worst side in most societies.  "American History X" deals on
the nefarious activiites of a gang of such haters known as
skinheads, focusing intensely on Derek (Edward Norton), a
confirmed neo-Nazi, and the powerful impact he has on the
thought and behavior of his kid brother Danny (Edward
Furlong).  Because the two young men are exceptionally
bright and articulate, they are all the more dangerous and
ultimately self-destructive.  While the movie condemns the
fascist behavior of a group of white kids, largely losers, it lays
out blame among other ethnic groups as well.  Nor does
David McKenna, who composed the screenplay for this taut,
tension-filled and violent picture, summarily dismiss some of
the arguments that the skins use for their activities, points of
view held by people of reason and non-violence as well as
those on the outer fringes of society.
   Employing color in the scenes depicting present-day
activities and black-and-white photography for flashbacks
narrated by young Danny, director Tony Kaye uses the
device of a conference between Danny and his high-school
principal, Dr. Sweeney (Avery Brooks), to lead into the tale. 
Called on the carpet for turning in a paper essentially praising
the ideas in "Mein Kampf," Danny is ordered by the school's
leader to write a composition overnight about the source of
his ideas.  As Danny pecks into his computer a tale of
danger, intrigue, and the politics of gangs, Kaye turns up the
flames to show the source of hatred which prompts Derek to
tattoo a swastika across his chest as a vivid symbol of his
extremist ideology.  Derek's dad, a fireman, had been
murdered in the course of duty by a gang member, pushing
Derek politically into a right-wing fringe group.  He develops a
simplistic and unoriginal philosophy blaming immigrants and
minorities for what he calls a deterioration of American
values.  After killing two young black men who are stealing
his car, one with exceptional brutality, he serves three years
in jail, which gives him the opportunity to rethink his ideas. 
When he returns to society, his hair has grown back and he
has done an about face, trying to persuade the brother who
loves and worships him to reverse his thinking as well.  
   While the transformation from hater to a virtual liberal is far
from convincing given the situations he finds himself in while
incarcerated, the story itself is gutsy, refusing to shrink from a
wholesale baring of some of the common, simplistic
contentions that Americans have locked into even before the
days of the Salem Witch trials.  Because the movie was
conspicuously re-edited to emphasize the ferocity of the
contending groups, director Tony Kaye has dissociated his
name from the movie.  Despite the attempts to inflate an
already highly controversial subject through pumped-up
music, muscular close-ups, and the portrayal of skinhead as
even stupider than their severest critics maintain, a robust
performance by the talented, multi-dimensional Edward
Norton keeps the audience juices flowing.  Guy Torry
supplies much of the scant humor of the film in the role of
Lamont, a black man who has been assigned to work
together in prison with Derek and who, through his sense of
waggery and kindly disposition can be considered the catalyst
for the charismatic fascist's evolution.

Author
Carol Bloom
American History X (1998) 3 1/2 stars out of 4
 American History X is a brutal, saddening story of hate and the bitter
fruit it sows.
 The movie is a powerful and disturbing drama about prejudice, its
consequences and family.
 And director Tony Kaye gets right in your face with his message. Much of
the movie is shot in close-up, so you can look these people in the eyes.
 The drama centers around two brothers, Derek (Edward Norton) and Danny
(Edward Furlong). The story is narrated by Danny, who idolizes his older
brother.
 Derek, following the death of his firefighting father - who was shot while
battling a blaze at a crack house - succumbs to a philosophy of hate and is
transformed into a charismatic leader of a white power movement.
 Derek is sent to prison for murder. There, he goes through a process of
self-discovery, realizing that what he thought he knew and what he was
taught by Cameron (Stacy Keach), the behind-the-scenes manipulator of the
skinheads, is bogus.
 Released from prison after three years, Derek arrives home and finds Danny
starting to trod Derek's old path - hanging around with Cameron and the
other skinhead losers.
 Derek works to dissuade Danny from that life of hatred, trying to convince
him of the lies and intolerance spewed by Cameron.
 Danny, meanwhile, must rewrite a school paper for his history class
because the one he wrote on Mein Kampf - at Cameron's urging - was
rejected. The principal orders him to write about Derek, how he feels about
him and the events leading to Derek's incarceration.
 Through this process, and through talks with Derek, Danny slowly comes to
realize the truth - that the venom spewed by Cameron and his ilk creates
nothing but misery.
 Kaye and screenwriter David McKenna spare no one as the sins of one
brother are visited upon the other.
 Many disturbing scenes, especially the trashing of a Korean-owned grocery
story, will leave you breathless in their mindless violence.
 Norton gives a powerful performance, his best since his stunning debut in
Primal Fear. He shows Derek's intelligence, his charisma and his
commitment, both to the cause to which he thought he believed and, after
his release from prison, his resolve to extract his brother from the
ill-fated path he followed.
 Norton's performance is of Academy-Award caliber.
 Furlong, best remembered as young John Conner from Terminator 2: Judgment
Day, brings a sense of confusion mixed with adulation to his role as the
impressionable younger brother.
 With his skinhead haircut and slit-eyed glance, one can see the virus of
hate planted in the boy begin to grow. When Danny is around Derek, his
entire posture changes. He is more the young, adoring brother hanging on
every word said by his older sibling.
 There is a powerful moment when the brothers take down all the hate
literature and Nazi paraphernalia hanging in their bedroom. No words are
needed. Their actions say it all.
 Later, Derek stares long and hard at the large, black swastika tattooed
over his heart, with a look combining regret and shame. Again, without a
word, Derek places his hand over his heart in order to obliterate the foul
reminder of his past life.
K aye has gathered a rather impressive cast. Keach, as Cameron, is, in
Derek's words, "a chicken hawk," preying on young dissatisfied minds to
convert to his cause, sending them out to do his dirty work while he stays
in the shadows. Keach speaks in calm, low, soothing tones, pouring his ugly
philosophy into the ears of boys such as Danny. He is a snake in human
form.
 Avery Brooks, as the school's principal and Derek's former teacher, is a
rock of integrity, a man who wants to help the brothers regain their moral
equilibrium.
 Beverly D'Angelo and Elliott Gould are featured as the brothers' mother
and her would-be suitor. Gould's Murray, a liberal Jewish teacher, is
driven away by Derek's racist and anti-Semitic tirades.
 Kaye refuses to allow a happy ending. Tragedy, built from hate and
bigotry, strikes Derek's family, and the consequences of his earlier
actions are brought home in the most brutal manner.
 American History X is not a comfortable movie. It will make you squirm. It
will shock and disgust you. But most of all it will sadden you. The movie
is a fine treatise on hate, a movie that should not and cannot be ignored.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Author
Michael Dequina
_American_History_X_ (R) *** (out of ****)
"A Tony Kaye film."  "Directed by Tony Kaye."  Whether he likes it or not,
after a still-developing war of words (and very expensive trade ads) with
the higher-ups at New Line Cinema and the Directors Guild, the embattled
first-time feature director has his name on the credits of the release cut
of _American_History_X_.  Much has been made of the issues of artistic
integrity and free speech, but precious little has been made of the film
itself--except that, according to Kaye, it no longer reflects his original
vision.  I do not know what exactly Kaye had in mind for his _X_, but the
film I saw, flawed though it may be, definitely works on its own merits. 
The main reason for the film's effectiveness the impassioned work of
Edward Norton.  He stars as Derek Vinyard, a young man who turns to a
racist gang after his firefighter father is murdered.  Head shaven and with
a swastika tattooed to his chest, Derek is hate incarnate, and his rage
leads to the brutal murder of two black men and a prison sentence.  After
three years, Derek emerges from prison a changed man, determined to let go
of a violent life that, of course, won't so easily let go of him.  It's a
formulaic character progression, but Norton's intensity makes it fresh and
involving.  His depth and nuance convincingly meshes his character's two
sides: utterly despicable and chilling as the skinhead Derek and
sympathetic but--crucially--no less edgy, as the post-prison Derek.
The character of Derek and his personal journey are riveting, but less so
are writer David McKenna's additional narrative touches--namely the focal
relationship between younger brother Danny (Edward Furlong), who idolizes
his brother and appears headed down the same destructive path of hate.
Derek's attempts to steer Danny in the right direction is the central
dramatic issue, but there's no real tension.  Danny is less a character
than a plot device, with no clearly defined personality trait other than
his emulation of his brother, thus there's very little suspense as to
whether or not Danny will change.
While Kaye has disassociated himself from all aspects of the film, one
other thing his name is attached to aside from the direction is the
cinematography, and he does a stunning job.  The story mostly unfolds in
flashback, with Derek's despicable actions and brutal prison experience
shown in black-and-white--no doubt a visual extension of the race theme.
But the absence of full color also lends the more violent scenes an added
roughness, and, in turn, a heightened sense of reality.
_American_History_X_ ends on a fairly predictable note, but the resolution
effectively reinforces the film's strong anti-hate, anti-violence message.
Perhaps in Kaye's editing hands the film would have been more well-rounded,
less formulaic, and, as such, more powerful and profound.  Alas, as it
currently stands, the incendiary _X_, for all its faults, still makes a
lasting, thought-provoking impression.  (opens October 30)
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@iname.com   |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com

Author
Scott Renshaw
     Making a movie about racism is virtually a no-win proposition.
Ninety-nine percent of the time, a film-maker will spend two hours making
it excruciatingly clear that racism is bad, inspiring either righteous
nods of approval or rolled eyes at the explication of the self-evident.
We all feel good abour ourselves as right-thinking people, but we get the
point already.  What more is there to say if you're only making a
cinematic sermon for the choir?
     There is another option, which is even tricker:  exploring the gray
areas of what makes racist principles attractive.  It's a risky endeavor
-- you might find people chastising you for not making racism obviously
bad _enough_ -- but it's the most potentially compelling.  For all its
flaws, AMERICAN HISTORY X grabs you because it throws you inside the
racist mind more effectively than any film I can remember.  The center of
that exploration is Edward Norton's creepy-smart performance as Derek
Vinyard, a young skinhead we meet in two incarnations.  Just released from
a three year prison sentence, he's a reformed neo-Nazi trying to save his
hero-worshipping younger brother Danny (Edward Furlong) from a similar
fate.  In flashback, he's a revered skinhead adept at recruiting new blood
into the white power gangs led by Cameron (Stacy Keach).
     Those flashback sequences are by far the most effective, photographed
by director Tony Kaye in icy black-and-white.  Remarkably, they begin from
the premise that Derek and Danny are both intelligent rather than red-neck
morons.  Devastated by his firefighter father's murder in a predominantly
black neighborhood, Derek has justified his hatred with ideas disturbingly
familiar from contemporary policy discussions about affirmative action and
welfare.  Derek is chilling because he's not merely spewing bile and
epithets -- he's making racism _make sense_ like a master rhetorician.
It's that kind of audience-baiting that makes portions of AMERICAN HISTORY
X so disturbing, particularly in a neighborhood basketball game sequence
where Kaye masterfully manipulates viewers into siding with Derek and his
skinhead cronies.
     Eventually, of course, the rhetoric of hatred turns into actions of
hatred, leading to AMERICAN HISTORY X's most devastating sequences.  The
first shows Derek leading his gang on a rampage through a Korean-owned
grocery store, terrorizing a black female clerk in a manner somehow more
unsettling than the physical assaults on Mexican-American employees.  The
second shows us the reason for Derek's incarceration -- the murder of two
black carjackers -- in a moment more shocking than you might think movies
can be any more.  Norton is perhaps at his most brilliant in this
sequence; his raised eyebrows of triumph as he is being arrested may be
the most memorable single moment of screen acting this year.
    It's hard to imagine AMERICAN HISTORY X ever getting made without the
redemption/salvation angle, but it would have been much stronger without
it.  Though Derek's transformation further emphasizes his intelligence --
he's forced to change his views when his friendship in prison with a black
inmate (Guy Torry) provides him with new evidence -- it can only lead to a
great big Moral to the Story.  Even more unnecessary is the contrived
device in which Danny is forced to write a history paper on Derek's road
to ruin, leading to a resolution that feels disappointingly pat.  There's
a grand sense of Shakesepearean tragedy to the conclusion, but not nearly
the intensity of emotion present as we're pulled into Derek's racist
world.  We get that racism is bad.  AMERICAN HISTORY X works because it
risks showing us why some people believe it's good.

Author
Greg King
AMERICAN HISTORY X (M).  
(New Line Cinema/Village Roadshow)
Director: Tony Kaye
Stars: Edward Norton, Edward Furlong, Beverly D'Angelo, Fairuza Balk, 
Avery Brooks, Elliott Gould, Stacy Keach
Running time: 119 minutes.
Written by David McKenna, American History X explores the
origins of hatred and bigotry, and shows how those attitudes can be
passed from one generation to the next.  The film shows how
frustrated, insecure and impressionable youth are seduced by poisonous
ideologies.  This is an environment in which violence begets violence,
and history repeats itself with tragic consequences.  Derek Vinyard
(Edward Norton) is a vicious white supremist who kills three black
youths as they attempt to break into his car.  After three years in
prison he emerges a changed man.  His experiences have taught him
tolerance, and he no longer believes in the vile and spurious messages
spouted by his mentor (Stacy Keach).
Derek tries to heal the rift within his own family caused by
his violent and intolerant actions.  He also tries to steer his
impressionable younger brother Danny (T2's Edward Furlong) away from
following a similar path to self-destruction.  Danny worships Derek,
and, in his absence, has fallen under the spell of the same creed of
hatred and intolerance.
British director Tony Kaye makes a solid debut with this
powerfully disturbing and controversial portrait of racial hatred and
the rising tide of fascism in contemporary America.  The odious
rhetoric, and some of the characters and scenes, may remind audiences
of the repellent Romper Stomper.  However, unlike that film, American
History X manages to temper its extreme images with a more optimistic
message.  Given recent events in both England and America, American
History X's ending has an immediacy that makes its cautionary message
even more relevant.
Kaye also doubled as cinematographer, and he captures some
powerful images.  The extended flashback sequences are filmed in black
and white, which somehow gives them added power.  One flashback to the
crucial murders contains one of the most brutal scenes I've seen in
any recent movie.  Norton apparently had disagreements with Kaye over
the direction of the film and reshot portions of it himself.
The pair of dynamic central performances will mesmerise
audiences as well as leave them shaken.  With his short cropped hair
and a swastika tattooed on his chest, Derek cuts a frightening figure.
Norton delivers a blistering, volatile, and intelligent performance
that explores his contradictions, and builds upon his superb credits
in Primal Fear and The People Vs Larry Flynt.  Furlong continues to
impress with a solid performance that captures Danny's vulnerability
and gives the character some unexpected depths.  Keach is a nasty
piece of work as the sinister, self-appointed head of a white
supremist organisation.
This powerful and often confronting film presents a
frightening and genuinely disturbing view of society.  Its gut
wrenching message and impact here are every bit as effective as films
like Boyz N The Hood.  This is an important film that demands to be
seen.

Author
Steve Rhodes
AMERICAN HISTORY X, director Tony Kaye's vitriolic movie, paints an
unflinching portrait of an America filled with uncontrollable racial
hatred.  Focusing on two young men within a Nazi skinhead group of young
whites, the didactic story suggests a world of warring gangs, segregated
by race, whose raison d'etre is to malign and kill all the other races.
Starring Edward Norton as Derek Vinyard, the proudly racist leader, the
film partially overcomes David McKenna's ridiculously vituperative
script by the force of Norton's performance.  The movie is such
balderdash that, were it not for the seriousness of the subject matter,
one might find it laughable.
Norton, a chameleon of an actor, sheds the mousy look of his roles in
EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU and THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT for a buff body,
heavy on the tattoos.  Using the explosiveness he showed in his Oscar
nominated performance in PRIMAL FEAR, he brings a chilling credibility
to the role of a hate monger and killer.  In short, he is the reason,
and the only reason, to see the movie.  Without him, the ludicrous
picture would be close to unbearable.
The story starts with 3 African-Americans breaking into Derek's car.
His younger brother and future skinhead, Danny (Edward Furlong) sees
them and interrupts his brother during sex to tell him.  Derek grabs an
automatic weapon and starts killing people.  When one of them refuses to
die from the bullet wounds, Derek crushes his skull on the curb.
Derek goes to prison, and, when he gets out, he spends his time trying
to extricate his younger brother from the white supremacist movement.
The movie jumps backward and forward in time with all periods filled
with long diatribes of racial epithets.
The supporting cast covers all the stereotypes.  Elliott Gould is a
wimpy Jew who'd liked to date Derek's mom were he not scared of Derek.
Beverly D'Angelo is Derek's sickly mom, who coughs between every drag of
the cigarettes she chain smokes.  Ethan Suplee plays Derek's skinhead
buddy, a 400-pound behemoth who couldn't speak without the use of
profanities.  Stacy Keach is a creepy old member of the skinhead set who
plays puppeteer to his Nazi minions.  And the teacher who befriends the
Vinyard boys is an African-American high school teacher with 2 -- count
'em -- 2 Ph.Ds.
The manipulative film, when it isn't spewing racial slurs, uses images
to toy with our emotions.  After Derek complains about how "those
people" are destroying his neighborhood, the camera cuts to an innocent
little, 3-year-old black girl, smiling warmly into the camera.
Anne Dudley's score for the film is impressive, but misplaced.  Full of
long violin notes and dramatic Kettledrums, it strongly punctuates a
film that needs some subtly.
Among the biggest deficiencies in the story is the lack of proper
motivation for Derek's beliefs and actions.  One time it is suggested
that it has something to do with his father's murder.  Later the movie
implies that his attitude stems from a two-minute conversation that he
had at dinner with his dad.  Derek has been reading and liking "Native
Son," in his high school class, but his dad warned him against the book
and the double-Ph.D. teacher who assigned it.  We are asked to believe
that, after this brief conversation, his life was forever changed.
AMERICAN HISTORY X runs 1:57.  It is rated R for graphic brutal violence
including rape, pervasive profanity, sex and nudity.  It should be
considered NC-17 and would be acceptable only for the maturest
teenagers.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Walter Frith
Edward Norton is quickly establishing himself as a solid player among
his Hollywood peers.  In three short years in Hollywood, he has played
many different characters: a vicious killer, a pornographer's attorney
and a gambling loser.  Not to mention an appearance in a musical.  How's
that for diversity?  One guy, yes only one, wrote me a short time ago
and said that my movie reviews are too short.  In the age of the
Internet where we are literally drowning in information, I told him that
my reviews aren't too short, they're just right, considering the fact
that I want to give people a chance to read other critic's reviews so
why should I ramble on and on and on.  Those roles I mentioned in which
Edward Norton appeared ----- research them for yourself to give yourself
some extra time if you feel my reviews are too short.  That'll keep you
busy for a while but if you have to look up the roles, you aren't much
of a movie fan.
The hypocrisy of hate, based on race and executing that hate through
criminal actions is examined expertly in 'American History X'.  Edward
Norton plays a neo-Nazi skinhead who reforms his ways somewhat, after
being released from prison, and butts heads with his former white power
superior (Stacy Keach).  But Norton's biggest problem is that his
younger brother (Edward Furlong), is on the same path and will probably
end up like his brother if he continues on his current course of action.
This film has more grit and raw violence to make its point in a totally
necessary fashion than almost any other film in 1998.  The most engaging
thing about some of the scenes is the fact that director Tony Kaye uses
black and white and slow motion during some of the film's most shocking
moments.  More importantly, the film doesn't take one course of action,
possibly taking a turn to drag and lose some of its power.  The film
jumps back and fourth from the present to the past constantly throughout
its entire running time..
One night Norton executes two black men for attempting to steal his
truck from his driveway and goes to prison for it.  In prison and given
laundry detail, he is forced to work with a black prisoner and becomes
drawn to him to the point of near friendship and realizes that there is
good and bad in everyone.  A lesson he learned the hard way since his
father was killed by black drug dealers as a fireman and Norton had it
in for all black people based on that one incident.  A black man and
Norton's former and his brother's present history teacher (Avery Brooks)
is the foundation building the right path in this movie and re-names
Furlong's class american history x.  It's a re-working of his current
class which will be a one on one session each day at school as a
reprimand after Furlong hands in a project arguing hate is the right way
and white way for his race to behave in protecting their civil rights
and Furlong even argues in favour of Hitler.
Edward Norton deserves an Oscar nomination for this film and the social
commentary put forward by writer David McKenna is a constant reminder of
how history is carried on in the present day in American society where
words and beliefs are sometimes more harsh than violence.
Whatever your beliefs are, 'American History X' strives to be a visually
stunning and hard core examination of race relations in America where
just looking the wrong way in other people's eyes can get you killed and
where your right to believe in your own convictions can be as
destructive or rewarding as you allow it to be.  One of 1998's ten best
films
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Aaron Michaels
Directed by Tony Kaye. Written by David McKenna. Running time: 117
minutes. Rated R (for graphic brutal violence including rape, pervasive
language, strong sexuality and nudity).
Racism is a horrible thing that has not been really put to film
much. A few films stick in my mind as anti-racist but most films that
stand up for other religions. Schindler's List was the last great
anti-racism film.  American History X is the newest.
Derek Vinyard has had a tormented life. His father was murdered while
he was a teenager and Derek's life changed completely. He became the
leader of a Nazi group in Venice Beach, California. After a horrible
crime is committed Derek is sent to prison. He leaves with him his
mother Doris (Beverly D'Angelo), his sister Davina (Jennifer Lien),
and his younger brother Danny (Edward Furlong)
Years later when Derek is let out of prison he comes to see a shaved
head Nazi Danny. Derek has been reformed the hardness of prison and he
is shocked at how evil Danny has become. He tries desparately to
change his younger brother. He shocks his former friends with his
reformed self and this sets off a night long adventure of running and
trying to set things right.
Edward Norton gives the performance of his career as Derek. Flashback
scenes show him musclebound, which is not like his tall and skinny
self, which Norton pulls off the know-how many veteran actors don't
reach. He conveys the evil that is rippling in every tattooed muscle
in flashbacks and a older brother approach for his present day scenes
out of prison. Edward Furlong also does a great job as Danny who is
titering between good and evil when Derek gets out of prison. He still
looks as he did in his debut Terminator 2: Judgement Day but he can
act a lot more now.
Director Tony Kaye, who's only past credits were commericals, was not
happy with the final print. He claims Edward Norton took over the film
and made a lot of cuts. If he did than he should be actor and editor
for the next movie. Kaye is very good in his debut doing both
directing and cinematographing. I don't know how much was Kaye's
original product but maybe we will see his cut on DVD as a director's
cut in the future. The current cut is good enough for me though.
This film is brutal. The Nazi scenes are violent, bloody, and hateful
as are the prison scenes. The flashbacks of Derek's past in prison and
as leader of the Venice Beach groups are all filmed in black and white
much like Schindler's List. I'm not exactly sure why Kaye decided to
film the flashbacks like this but it doesn't effect the flow of the
movie.
Some complaints I've heard about this film are mostly script
related. I can't find anything wrong with David McKenna's script. My
only complaint is that the film is awfully short. This lessens the
epic or classic feeling a film like this usually has. That's a very
small complaint though and doesn't change my rating much.
I've heard a lot of horrible racist stories in my life. Thank God I've
never had to experience any though. I grew up hearing stories about
how my ancestors who lived along the Civil War times and as recently
as their teens in the 1950s and 1960s. The stories are sickening and
shock you into not creating stories of your own. American History X
feels just like one of these stories only we actually get to see the
carnage.
Doug Galecawitz from Darien, Illinois wrote into the Internet Movie
Database (www.imdb.com) and posted a review to this film. He typed in
it that he saw American History X with his friend who had been a Nazi
and a raccist before. Doug says his friend hung his head in shame
while walking out of this movie. This film will scare both current
Nazis and people who want to be Nazis into a life of happiness. This
is the kind of film that should be mandatory viewing for high
schoolers. No school violence or discrimination would be fantastic.

Author
Eric Vinegart
Directed by Tony Kaye. Written by David McKenna. Running time: 118
minutes. Rated R (for graphic brutal violence, including rape,
pervasive language, strong sexuality and nudity).
Tempe, AZ -- "American History X" is one of those movies riddled with
problems that somehow escapes the benefit of audience testing and is
released anyway.  I wasn't too amused with all the confusing scene
shifts from past to present tense, only to recover by recall from
memory to keep things together (very distracting).  Without the
movie's change from color to black-and-white and Derek's change from
hair to skinhead, we would've all been lost.  And the script has
issues running in different directions without really gluing them
together, and we're not totally certain of a focused theme.  The
investors must be really pissed that some lame-ass didn't put all the
money in the right places, and probably spent a lot instead on
self-aggrandizing expenditures.  Standard fare for a lot of dweebs in
drug-infested Tinsel town today, I'm sure, where a lot of production
never quite makes it off the ground.
As is the case with any highly publicized movie, lots of reviews get
written (those advertising dollars build fires under people's asses),
and after reading many of them, I was left wanting more, as I felt I
wanted after watching the movie.  I longed to see if any critic delved
into the deep reaches that this theme explores, and read first-hand
the message I felt that came through loudest for me while viewing
"American History X".  But not one did, and most critics sang the same
old tune, which was to summarize the story, comment on the
special-effects crap, the actors and their dimension, dialogue, score,
cinematography, and how much or how hard the sex was and all the other
stuff to ad nauseam.  Like me, you probably are looking to see what
others have to say about this movie, and you already know all the
trivia shit.  And we want a little more meat.
The most pivotal point in the movie is during a flashback when Derek
(Edward Norton II) is in the prison laundry with Lamont, the black,
stand-up comic inmate (Guy Torrey).  We already know how much hate
Derek has had, given his father was killed by black drug addicts, and
dinner-table indoctrination against the evils of affirmative action.
When Lamont gives Derek direction on how to treat a woman so as not to
lose her while in the joint, each word punctuated with a sex-act
stroke (belly-laugh funny), the spectacle is too much for Derek to
remain angry any more and he can't help laugh with what must surely be
the first time ever with a black person.  We witness a friendship form
here, and when Derek finds out Lamont got six years for stealing a
television, Norton's superb acting convinces us that his character no
longer believes the enemy to be blacks, Koreans, border jumpers, and
illegal Hispanics, but instead a corrupt economic and social system
collapsing under its own weight.
At this point in the movie I expect and want a hero to rise up against
the real enemy -- the individuals responsible for corruption -- and
set out on a search-and-destroy mission.  But that doesn't happen.
Even though we have had superb character transformation and
motivation, Derek doesn't want to go on to do anything except turn on
his followers and try to save only his own ass and his brother.  We
really are cheated from what could become a greater movie.
There are problems telling stories about racism, the same as with
politics and religion (and now feminism, too).  We don't get to see
the true cause of Derek's hatred, which has less to do with his father
who was killed by blacks, and more with a society top-heavy with
blood-sucking parasites who skim all the cream from the top, leaving
the rest of us to fight over what is left.  In a world of plenty,
people don't argue over anything.  When was the last time we heard of
a feud between fat-cats?  Jews and Hispanics in Hollywood don't fight.
Neither do black and white athletes with seven-figure incomes.  But
they do in real life where competition and slimmer pickings can mean
you come up short.  Or when it means you get beat out of a job to a
border-jumper.
Problems today in society are so monumental, barely one person is left
who still sees real truth.  It's designed this way on purpose, the
same as SWAT teams use stun bombs to confuse and catch hostage-takers
off guard.  Our government does not want us to rise up against their
insane policies, much less find out, least they again experience Viet
Nam-era riots throughout the land.  I'm left wanting "American History
X" and Derek to pound home this message, but they don't.
Television is replete with newscasts daily of celebrity or
professional athletes who enter drug-treatment centers.  And how many
are ever convicted for possession and sentenced to twenty years in
prison?  America has a near-one-million felons in prison on drug
offenses, and barely a single one is a celebrity or of wealth.  This
is real injustice, and for one in which we want a Derek to rise up and
unite all against.
Racism has more origin in a corrupt and unfair system, than it does
with any dislike that one class of people may have for another.  Like
drinking-and-driving accidents produce hit-and-run felons, because the
consequences for accountability are so severe, corporations no longer
have compassion for employees because it's too expensive and the
consequences too grave -- bankruptcy.  And so, in a system where it's
every-man-for-himself mentality, justification for our capacity to
step on our fellow man is easy in a world with a press eager to help
demonize the poor who must now, just to survive, resort to theft,
deception and crime, and who most always are black, border-jumpers and
poor.
While "American History X" depicts an over-crowded America replete
with exploiting free-loading border-jumpers and unemployed blacks, it
fails to bring the real problem into focus.  We sense that Derek sees
through all the bullshit and now knows the real enemies,
profit-seeking structures and tax-fed organizations, which can no
longer flourish without a growing consumer base to draw from and sell
to.  And so borders are left open and families (and single women) are
encouraged, allowed, even motivated to multiply as quickly as biology
allows.  Naturally, as with any activity that makes money, Madison
Avenue successfully dupes mothers to produce at breeder-cow rate,
using slick pictures and detailed copy instructions in big-circulation
magazines and sit-com TV shows, and little if any thought is ever
given to the horrible consequence for offspring in an already
over-crowded, over-used world.
Overall, "American History X" is still a fair movie.  But its
producers blew a wonderful opportunity to make a statement for the
origins of racism, and leave a warm fuzzy feeling as was so eloquently
done in, for example, "Billy Jack" and "To Sir With Love".  A script
going in a different direction from Derek's transformation would have
helped solve this problem.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
American History X (1998)
Edward Norton, Edward Furlong, Beverly D'Angelo, Avery Brooks, Stacy 
Keach, Fairuza Balk, Jennifer Lien, Elliott Gould, William Russ, Ethan 
Suplee, Joe Cortese, Guy Torry, Giuseppe Andrews, Antonio David Lyons, 
Keram Malicki-Sanchez, Jordan Marder, Nicholas Oleson, Anne Lambton. 
Produced by John Morrissey. Written by David McKenna. Directed by Tony 
Kaye. 117 minutes.
Rated R, 4 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to 
pbbp24a@prodigy.com
In "American History X," Edward Norton gives an Oscar-worthy performance 
as Derek Vinyard, a racist skinhead. What a sight he is to behold. Black 
and white flashbacks show Derek, often shirtless and very buff, dazzling 
those around him with his ferocious rhetoric and fiery behavior. He is 
smart, sexy and charismatic and it's easy to understand why others are 
drawn to him. 
"American History X" works the audience as well as Derek works his 
followers. While the racist words and actions are incredibly repellent, 
the flashback scenes are lovingly filmed in an attractive, high-quality 
music video fashion. Even when the action turns horribly violent, it's 
depicted as stylishly as a commercial for perfume or blue jeans. The 
filmmakers condemn the hate, but the perpetrators of said hate look so 
damn cool. Think "Pulp Fiction" or "A Clockwork Orange" and you'll know 
what I mean. 
The intent is obvious. The film uses sex and style to draw us in, then 
flips everything around to rub our noses in our own voyeuristic 
complicity. We viscerally experience how seductive well-phrased hate 
speech and violent imagery can be, then we are shown the tragic 
consequences of that mentality. It's a risky tactic. I've read reports of 
skinheads cheering during sections of "American History X." Sadly, some 
people will walk out of this film energized by the hate rhetoric and 
glamorization of violence. Hopefully, most viewers will get the point. 
Set in sunny Venice Beach, we meet young Danny (Edward Furlong), a bright 
student who worships older brother Derek, a zealot in the local white 
supremacist movement. Derek's rhetoric turns to action, ending in a 
brutal assault that lands him in prison for manslaughter. Three years 
later, on the day of Derek's release, Danny hands his teacher a glowing 
essay on "Mein Kampf." The furious instructor hauls the boy to Principal 
Sweeney (Avery Brooks), who assigns the kid a new project. He must write 
a paper, to be titled "American History X," that documents the 
circumstances that led his brother to prison. Danny returns home for a 
festive neo-Nazi reunion with his brother, only to learn that Derek had a 
major change of heart in prison. He now rejects his former beliefs and 
wants his brother to do the same. But is it too late? 
Danny's work on his paper provides the framework for the story, as 
flashbacks introduce the Vinyard's extended family and the environment 
from which the hatred grew. Director Tony Kaye (who unsuccessfully tried 
to have his name removed from the film over an editing dispute) presents 
a series of exceptionally vivid vignettes. We witness a confrontation 
between blacks and whites on a basketball court, various family fights, 
meetings between Derek and the manipulator behind the skinhead group 
(Stacy Keach), a horrific gang attack on a Korean grocery, and, of course,
 Derek's fatal assault on some black petty thieves. 
One of the most disturbing scenes shows the boy's father, a weary 
firefighter, in a dinner-table speech that begins with his complaints 
about affirmative action and escalates into a racist diatribe. What makes 
the monologue so disquieting is its familiarity. Anyone who listens to 
conservative talk radio has heard the early portions of the father's 
argument. It's frightening to see how easily it turns from a hard-working 
family man's expression of frustration and perceived injustice into 
something very dangerous. The scene is a powerful reminder that people 
don't magically become monsters. It's a slower, much more insidious 
process that happens in all too many American homes.
"American History X" is a flawed work. Aside from Norton and Furlong, 
most of the other characters are little more than rough sketches. Derek's 
conversion from neo-Nazi back to human is sufficiently explained, but 
still seems a bit too abrupt. And some of Kaye's camera tricks, 
particularly the many shots of water in slow motion, are overly-mannered 
and distracting.
Still, the film packs a hell of a punch. If you want to see a powerful 
movie that depicts skinheads without a hint of romanticism, rent the 
devastating "Romper Stomper." But if you're willing to submit to a movie 
that goes a step further, not only condemning bigotry and violence but 
also challenging contemporary filmgoers, like us, who embrace cinematic 
depictions of violence and hate, give "American History X" a chance. You 
won't feel comfortable when you leave the theater, but you'll have a lot 
to think about.

Author
Joy Wyse
American History X is not an easy film to watch.  Looking back on it I
remember the song from `South Pacific' whose lyrics are: `You've got to be
taught to be afraid, of people whose eyes are oddly made, of people whose
skin is a different shade.  You've got to be carefully taught.'    That is
the basic story behind American History X.  What makes a young man, Derek
Vinyard [Edward Norton] become a skinhead?  How did he learn to hate?  In
part, he learns from Cameron Alexander [Stacy Keach] who enlists Derek to
entice other disgruntled white teens to join his army of hatemongers.
But there's more to the story than that.   Although the action
supposedly takes place in one twenty-four hour period, the flashbacks take
it back through previous years.  Danny Vinyard [Edward Furlong] has been
called into the office of Mr. Sweeney [Avery Brooks] for writing an essay
about the civil rights of Adolf Hitler.  It is feared that Danny, in
emulating his older brother, Derek, is headed down the same path.  Derek
is being released from prison that day.  He has served a three-year
sentence for manslaughter for killing two black teens.  The killing scenes
are especially graphic.  Mr. Sweeney gives Danny the homework assignment
of writing about Derek and the course of his life to replace the
unacceptable essay.
Derek is not a totally unlikable person.  He's just confused by what
he's been taught in his short life.  When he is released from prison, he
has changed.   His friends, such as Seth [Ethan Suplee] cannot understand
this change.  During Derek's imprisonment Seth and most of his other
friends have banned together under the leadership of Cameron Alexander. 
They are not a likeable group.  It's sad to realize that there are groups
like this all over America today.  
There are too many subplots to mention and not all of them are
satisfactory.  We are dealing with a dysfunctional family who is really
very close.  They don't seem to realize just how dysfunctional they really
are.
I really enjoyed this movie, but I doubt that it will make any impact on
the movie audiences.  In many ways I fear that it could incite haters to
hate even more.  I'm glad that I saw it, but it is disturbing.  I don't
want to believe that this can happen.  I definitely don't want to see it
again, not even on free TV.   The best thing about it is the acting. 
Everyone in it is totally believable, and the two Edwards are destined to
be respected actors, which is more important than being `stars'.   I give
it a C.

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
The mess that was the post-production of this film has turned into one
of the finest cinematic efforts of the year (See little known facts
below for more info on the mess). Director Tony Kaye wanted his name
removed from this film after meddling from "suits" and actor Edward
Norton (Kaye's allegations). A technicality prevented him from removing
his name, and out of these ashes comes forth a solid film about race,
hate and the human spirit.
PLOT:
Super-neo-nazi-skinhead Derek Vinyard (Norton) gets put into jail for
killing two black youths that were trying to steal his car. During his
stay in the bighouse, his younger brother Danny (Furlong) follows his
hateful ways and joins the nearest skinhead clan. While in jail, Derek
goes through many changes, and comes out with a new outlook on life.
Now, he wants to relay his newfound enlightenment to his impressionable
brother, before it's too late.
CRITIQUE:
Intense, powerful, stylish directorial debut from British director Tony
Kaye, pulls together all aspects of dramatic achievement, including a
solid and emotional story line, an original film style and solid
performances by its cast, most specifically, the genuinely flawless
portrayal by Edward Norton. This film drives home many of the
sentiments seething beneath the hate of many people in this country. It
probes to explain and unravel their seeds of antipathy, while
presenting us with a fair portrayal of the many sides of the human
development. Why do we hate? And even when we do, do we allow it to
serve any real purpose in our lives, or do we simply hate because we
need something or someone else to blame? One of the characters said it
best in the film, "Has anything you've done, made your life better?"
This film grapples with many of the hypotheses behind these questions,
and insists on educating us through creative and thought-provoking
imagery, and solid performances by its main protagonists. This film
reminded me of 1996's DEAD MAN WALKING (8/10), with the main
performance by Norton rating on the same scale as that of Penn in the
former film. In fact, I see Norton's performance as the more complex of
the two, since he actually portrays two polar opposite personalities in
this same movie. And despite Norton's real-life Ivy League background,
he manages to pull off an impressive acting gig as the head skinhead
who eventually clues in as to the hypocrisies of his peers. Mr. Oscar,
please save a seat for Edward Norton for the end of the year
nominations for Best Actor, because this is definitely one deserved
performance. All that and he's built like a champ in this film. Wow,
what a man!
The rest of the cast was also well qualified to handle their posts,
with the other Edward, Furlong, handing in another well-developed
performance of a sulken youth whose heart is pierced with sensitivity.
The only small issues that I did have with this movie was that it was a
tiny bit too long, and that the portrayal of Norton's girlfriend by
Fairuza Balk, was completely one-dimensional. The flashbacks were
handled extremely well, the style of the film enhanced its viewing, and
the film's gut-wrenching conclusion drove home every point made in its
previous two hours. The openness of some minds does not alleviate the
continued presence of hate and fear in our society. It is up to each
and every individual to manage their own rationale of hate, and
determine the truth within its purpose. Who does it really benefit? 
This film bleeds the truth, speaks the lingo, and delivers on all
counts of entertainment, socially relevant value and solid
performances. Definitely one of the best told movies of the year! 
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director Tony Kaye wanted his name changed to "Humpty Dumpty" for this
film, because of his disagreements with New Line Cinema, but the
Director's Guild of America disallowed it (One of the rules in regards
to changing your name in movie credits, is that you have to agree not
to bad-mouth the movie in public. In Kaye's case, he had taken out ads
in the Daily Variety and The Hollywood Reporter, to do just that.) He
is presently putting together a documentary on the "Making of American
History X", which he hopes to premiere at next year's Sundance Film
Festival. His original cut of the movie was a mere 87 minutes, and he
also managed to be the cinematographer and camera operator on this
project.
Before this film, Tony Kaye had a lavish career as one of Europe's most
daring commercial directors, creating groundbreakingly gorgeous ads for
Guinness beer, Reebok and Volvo. 
Edward Norton lobbied hard for this role, and even offered to take a
pay cut (He claims that he only received about "one-fifth" of his then
$1million asking price.) He also put on 30 pounds of muscle for this
role. He has a history degree from Yale.
First-time screenwriter David McKenna is only 28 years of age.
Edward Furlong was discovered by a casting director at the Boys Club of
Pasadena, and won the part of John Connor in the 1991 film TERMINATOR 2
(8/10). He is presently involved in a live-in relationship with his
former tutor, Jackie Domac. She is 12 years his senior.
Actors Stacy Keach and Avery Brooks are better known for their
respective TV roles as "Mike Hammer: Private Eye" and Hawk from
"Spenser: For Hire". In 1984, Keach was jailed in England for nine
months for smuggling cocaine. Brooks spent 13 years as a Professor for
Drama-Science at Rutgers University in New Jersey from 1972 to 1985.
Fairuza (Balk) means turqoise in Turkish. 
Actor Ethan Suplee, who plays the fat skinhead Seth in this film, was
also in Kevin Smith's MALLRATS (6/10) and CHASING AMY (7/10).

Author
David Nusair
Starring Edward Norton, Edward Furlong, Stacy Keach, Avery Brooks, Fairuza
Balk, Beverly D'Angelo
It's been two short years since Edward Norton made his his movie debut in
"Primal Fear".  Despite only appearing in a handful of movies since then,
he has proven himself to be one of the best young actors working today. 
He's got a range that is not often seen in actors these days.  In many
ways, he's reminiscent of Sean Penn.  They both instantly draw an audience
in with their charisma, they both have the ability to disappear in their
roles, and most importantly, they are not afraid to tackle difficult
material. 
"American History X" stars Norton as a young skinhead who is living a life
he thinks is just.  A life filled with hatred and crime.  It all changes,
though, when he is arrested for murder and sent to prison for three years.
He comes out a changed man, and attempted to get his family out of that
life permanently, but discovers his younger brother (Furlong) has taken up
the cause.
The movie is told in black and white, and colour.  Tony Kaye, the
director, lays the symbolism on pretty thick.  The black and white is
reserved for the flashbacks, which show Norton in his pre-enlightenment
days.  The lack of colour is supposed to indicate, I guess, that he's not
really living like that.  It's not until he realizes that racism is wrong,
that the colours of the world open up to him.  Either that, or it was just
a tool to clarify for the audience what was a flashback and what was the
present.
The problem with the movie is that it feels more like a series of
vignettes, tied together by a recurring character.  There's no real sense
of plot here.  Scenes don't logically lead into one another.  Because of
this, there's no real flow to the film, which makes it hard for the viewer
to really get into it.  
My main problem with the film, though, is a scene that comes late in the
picture.  It's a flashback to Norton's pre-skinhead days.  We see him
telling his father, who was killed a few weeks later, about the book he is
reading, which happens to be about a black character.  The way his father
reacts to this shows him to be a definite racist.  But the part I didn't
like, is the way the Norton character so easily accepted what his father
said.  The way the scene was done, it appeared that these were thoughts
Norton had never had.  I found it quite hard to believe that an
intelligent kid like that would *instantly* accept these racist theories
provided by his father, without questioning it at all.  The way the scene
plays, it feels like it wasn't even part of the original script.  It's
like some executives decided that they wanted a definite rationale for why
Norton would get involved with the skinheads.  Well, it doesn't work.
"American History X" is worth the price of admission simply to witness
Norton's incredible performance.  I have no doubt, that come Oscar time,
he'll be nominated.  It's the best performance of his career, and for that
reason alone, the film is worth seeing.

Author
Paul X Foley
This harsh, beautifully crafted film is actually upsetting to watch,
it is so intense.  Edward Norton is at his finest, in a performance
that earned him an Oscar nomination.  It's quite simply the best
movie I've seen in years.
Though it is the story of one man's redemption, it is hardly
optimistic.  Derek Vinyard (Norton) is just released from prison;
a reformed neo-Nazi skinhead, he tries to stop his high school
age brother Danny (Furlong) from following in his footsteps. To
try to undo some of the damage he has done.
Derek's story is told in extensive flashbacks, his transformation
from a studious middle class 組ood kid' to a racist ringleader. 
Traumatized by the shooting death of his firefighter father,
which Derek is convinced was racially motivated, he turns his
rage into ideology.  What's truly frightening about Derek is that
he's bright and articulate.  He's not just another thug.  The goons
and losers in the Venice Beach fascist cell idolize him.
Neo-Nazi scum is made, not born.  Poisoned by the killing of the
father he idolized (who, it turns out, was prejudiced and not far
from being a racist himself), pressured by the family's reduced
circumstances in a deteriorating, crime-ridden neighborhood, 
Derek embraces an ideology of hate. He's helped down that road
by the local mini-Hitler (played with slimy abandon by Stacy
Keach).  But people are not merely products of their
environment.  Derek's sister Davina (Jennifer Lien) lives in the
same pressure-cooker household and has inherited the same
violent temper; the difference is she refuses to transform her rage
into an ideology.
As for young Danny, he's a kid who'd follow his big brother over
a cliff.  His essential sweetness and innocence stand in shocking
contrast to his shaved head and white-supremacist tattooing.  
The performances in this film are outstanding.  Ethan Suplee, as
a white supremacist hanger-on, is a crude and disgusting
presence who contaminates the Vinyard's cramped apartment
with his mere presence.  Avery Brooks, as mentor to the
reformed Derek, projects an unshakable dignity and
uncompromising morality.  Beverly D'Angelo is the sickly and
exhausted mother who should have given up but cannot.
In a movie that includes brutal murders and prison rape, the most
harrowing scene is a flashback to a dinner table discussion. The
conversation turns to the case of Rodney King; included are
Danny (still a skinhead) and his mother's boyfriend, a liberal
Jewish teacher (Gould). Civilized discussion inevitably
degenerates into argument and epithets.  When Davina does not
knuckle under to his chauvinistic verbal bullying, Derek resorts
to physical bullying. Worked up into a fury, he throws the guest
out of the house, shouting anti-Semitic insults; Davina returns
and goes at him with a baseball bat.  It's an ugly, horrible scene,
acted with great  intensity and conviction.  These people are
losing their humanity.
Shot largely in luminous, silvery black and white, the film's
aesthetic beauty almost seems to mock the pain of its characters. 
As do the sunny Southern California locations.  A city park
basketball game, whites versus blacks, is presented as high irony;
an epic battle fought for the basest of motives.  Director Tony
Kaye had his troubles on this project (he was eventually removed
by the studio in the editing stage) but he sure knows his way
around a camera.

Author
Ross Anthony
"Whewwww." An exclamation you'll likely hear exiting a showing of Tony
Kaye's American History X. The film is a pressure cooker of kerosene set on
simmer. Most of us tend to avoid tension in our daily lives, so if you've
forgotten how to stay calm while somebody probes you with a pointed object
such as racism -- either you should stay home or make sure you watch this
film to it's end.
Yes, whether you're white, black, yellow, Jewish, Christian, or even a
visiting extra terrestrial -- you are very likely to have an exercise in
restraint. And yes, American History X could be likened to a bent and rusty
dental implement; it's audience, a less than perfect set of teeth. Sound
like fun? "Fun" is definitely not the befitting word. But "poignant" might
be. Especially if you are temporarily mesmerized by the thought of hating --
as in race hate. Then take a look at this picture.
Aside from the uncomfortable feeling one gets at the sight of a bald white
man with a swastika the size of a tarantula tattooed to his chest, the film
was a bit awkward getting off the ground. The first 20 to 30 minutes were
aggravated slightly by some stiff dialogue and sticky acting. But after
that, a tar-thick layer of tension was cimematically laid via strong script,
careful direction, photography and a subject matter that has the strength in
it's little pinkie to tear America in half.
The middle is where this film effectively grabs (or should I say pins) the
viewer. A gritting dinner table scene with mother's boyfriend (Elliott
Gould) and skinhead Derek (Edward Furlong) serves Rodney King concentrate
instead of orange juice. I think I've still got my date's nail marks in my
wrist from that one. In another scene, Derek, being handcuffed in slo-mo,
connects eyes with his younger brother. That one glare tells the story of
their intense relationship. In fact, that one scene is the screenplay of
American History X in a glance. Artfully done.
I usually get antsy in longer films. My butt cheeks get cramped, or I'm
grinding my teeth to keep my bladder from bursting. For once, this is a film
I thought could have gone longer. Derek, gets a perspective-setting lesson
in prison (talk about posterior discomfort!). This and a wonderfully
developed friendship with a black inmate set his transformation in motion.
But it happens a bit too quickly for me.
All in all, Kaye paces this project well. Through its intense scenes and
grainy black and white flashbacks, the tale is revealed to us carefully.
It's a bold film, not afraid to speak it's mind. If you're bold enough to
see it, exercise your tolerance and sit through the whole thing.
American History X is high school student Danny Vinyard's (played by Edward
Furlong of T2 fame) essay on his older brother, Derek (Edward Norton) a
white supremacist skinhead just released from prison after killing two black
men.
Starring Edward Norton and Edward Furlong with Elliott Gould and Avery
Brooks.
Directed by Tony Kaye. Rated R.
Grade..........................B
--
Copyright Š 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Bob Bloom
 American History X (1998) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Edward Norton,
Edward Furlong, Stacy Keach, Avery Brooks, Beverly D'Angelo and Elliott
Gould. Directed by Tony Kaye.
 American History X is a brutal, saddening story of hate and the bitter
fruit it sows.
 The movie is a powerful and disturbing drama about prejudice, its
consequences and family.
 And director Tony Kaye gets right in your face with his message. Much of
the movie is shot in close-up, so you can look these people in the eyes.
 The drama centers around two brothers, Derek (Edward Norton) and Danny
(Edward Furlong). The story is narrated by Danny, who idolizes his older
brother.
 Derek, following the death of his firefighting father - who was shot while
battling a blaze at a crack house - succumbs to a philosophy of hate and is
transformed into a charismatic leader of a white power movement.
 Derek is sent to prison for murder. There, he goes through a process of
self-discovery, realizing that what he thought he knew and what he was
taught by Cameron (Stacy Keach), the behind-the-scenes manipulator of the
skinheads, is bogus.
 Released from prison after three years, Derek arrives home and finds Danny
starting to trod Derek's old path - hanging around with Cameron and the
other skinhead losers.
 Derek works to dissuade Danny from that life of hatred, trying to convince
him of the lies and intolerance spewed by Cameron.
 Danny, meanwhile, must rewrite a school paper for his history class
because the one he wrote on Mein Kampf - at Cameron's urging - was
rejected. The principal orders him to write about Derek, how he feels about
him and the events leading to Derek's incarceration.
 Through this process, and through talks with Derek, Danny slowly comes to
realize the truth - that the venom spewed by Cameron and his ilk creates
nothing but misery.
 Kaye and screenwriter David McKenna spare no one as the sins of one
brother are visited upon the other.
 Many disturbing scenes, especially the trashing of a Korean-owned grocery
story, will leave you breathless in their mindless violence.
 Norton gives a powerful performance, his best since his stunning debut in
Primal Fear. He shows Derek's intelligence, his charisma and his
commitment, both to the cause to which he thought he believed and, after
his release from prison, his resolve to extract his brother from the
ill-fated path he followed.
 Norton's performance is of Academy-Award caliber.
 Furlong, best remembered as young John Conner from Terminator 2: Judgment
Day, brings a sense of confusion mixed with adulation to his role as the
impressionable younger brother.
 With his skinhead haircut and slit-eyed glance, one can see the virus of
hate planted in the boy begin to grow. When Danny is around Derek, his
entire posture changes. He is more the young, adoring brother hanging on
every word said by his older sibling.
 There is a powerful moment when the brothers take down all the hate
literature and Nazi paraphernalia hanging in their bedroom. No words are
needed. Their actions say it all.
 Later, Derek stares long and hard at the large, black swastika tattooed
over his heart, with a look combining regret and shame. Again, without a
word, Derek places his hand over his heart in order to obliterate the foul
reminder of his past life.
 Kaye has gathered a rather impressive cast. Keach, as Cameron, is, in
Derek's words, "a chicken hawk," preying on young dissatisfied minds to
convert to his cause, sending them out to do his dirty work while he stays
in the shadows. Keach speaks in calm, low, soothing tones, pouring his ugly
philosophy into the ears of boys such as Danny. He is a snake in human
form.
 Avery Brooks, as the school's principal and Derek's former teacher, is a
rock of integrity, a man who wants to help the brothers regain their moral
equilibrium.
 Beverly D'Angelo and Elliott Gould are featured as the brothers' mother
and her would-be suitor. Gould's Murray, a liberal Jewish teacher, is
driven away by Derek's racist and anti-Semitic tirades.
 Kaye refuses to allow a happy ending. Tragedy, built from hate and
bigotry, strikes Derek's family, and the consequences of his earlier
actions are brought home in the most brutal manner.
 American History X is not a comfortable movie. It will make you squirm. It
will shock and disgust you. But most of all it will sadden you. The movie
is a fine treatise on hate, a movie that should not and cannot be ignored.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
Kevin W. Welch
Racism and hatred are bad, we all know. Still, it can't be as
easy as all that, because hatred and racism exist and even
flourish. American History X is as good a take on the source of
bigotry as you are likely to see.
Derek Vinyard is getting out of prison, where he's served three
years on a manslaughter charge after killing two black gangsters
who were stealing his car. He's leaving prison a changed man,
changed in ways you wouldn't believe if you'd known him earlier.
To bring home that change, the movie weaves the story of Derek's
first day out of prison with his pre-prison life told in
black-and-white flashback, with narration by Derek's admiring kid
brother.
Derek is a racist skinhead with a prominant swastika tatooed to
his chest. He's not your run of the mill gene pool hate monger.
Instead, Derek is smart, articulate, charismatic, courageous and
principled. This is American History X's subversive triumph. You
are repelled by Derek (at least I hope you are) but at the same
time, you see his virtues, you find him admirable in some way. He
is a real man, a standup guy, born to lead, a guy you'd want on
your side under ordinary circumstances.
Derek was recruited by an older white supremicist to recruit and
organize a gang of skinhead toughs in Venice Beach, where the
older white middle class is feeling beleaugured by Hispanics and
Blacks. Derek is effective, terribly effective, and quite
successful at his job. The script gives him speeches and his
speeches are the usual stuff about the white race being dragged
down by lazy immigrants, but there are delivered with hypnotic
intensity. Derek is a compelling leader and you understand
immediately why people follow him.
Then there are the killings. Derek kills the two car thieves, one
of them horrifically. In a stunning scene, you realize that the
man is an animal. It is one of the most fully rounded portraits
of evil I've ever seen.
This takes place half way through the movie. The rest of the film
is devoted to Derek explaining to his kid brother, a
proto-skinhead himself, just why he wants out of the life. The
prison story is another long flashback sequence that tells
another gripping story through a series of harrowing scenes and
graphic images. The story is so well done that at the end Derek's
transformation seems not just plausible but inevitable.
Now that Derek's out of prison, he has to break free of his past
(his release is eagerly awaited by his old colleagues) and save
his kid brother from being drawn further in. He does what he can.
American History X is a white Boyz N the Hood. It is the same
traditional story structure of kids getting in trouble and trying
to get themselves out, and the same edginess. The direction and
writing, by Tony Banks, brings a freshness to the material and
keeps you thinking that anything is hokey or contrived. Edward
Norton gives a remarkable performance as Derek, and Edward
Furlong does well as the kid brother. Avery Brooks is Dr.
Sweeney, the teacher who still gives a damn, and he doesn't load
down the part with a lot of sincere platitudes. Even though
they're on the opposite side of everything, there is still a
plausible bond of respect between Sweeney and Derek. There's not
a bad performance in the movie, and every gangster and skinhead
gives off just the right mix of menace and contempt, while every
family member is vulnerable and worn out in just the right way. A
surprising Elliott Gould plays a minor role as an English teacher
who just gave up on the Vinyard brothers. Amazingly well
directed, American History X is a mine of striking scenes and
memorable images. Besides Boyz N the Hood, it does not appear to
pay homage to any other movie but relies instead on its own
internal logic. That's the mark of a great,original movie, I
think.

Author
Marty Mapes
***1/2 (out of 4) There is nothing like AMERICAN HISTORY X in theaters
or on video. No other feature film takes such a cold hard look at the
lure, the culture, and the brotherhood of white supremacy.
Nice guy Ed Norton Jr. (who sang in EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU) plays
Derek, a twenty-year old skinhead. Dad's subtle racism grew large in
Derek, after gang members killed his father. Dad was fighting a fire
when they shot him. Now Derek keeps his head shaved and has a giant
swastika tattooed over his heart.
Derek is more interested in the IDEAS of white supremacy than in its
culture of violence. At a basketball court, black and white tempers
flare. Derek channels the aggression into a game, black versus white,
for ownership of the courts. When the choice presents itself, Derek goes
for game point instead of the sucker-punch. 
Cameron (Stacy Keach) steps in to Derek's life as a surrogate father. He
takes Derek under his wing and nurtures his racist feelings. Keeping his
own criminal record spotless, he uses Derek as a leader and organizer
for high-visibility racial intimidation. Derek obliges by leading his
younger and dumber friends in race-motivated mob crimes. At the bottom
of the chain, Derek's younger brother Danny (Edward Furlong, made famous
in TERMINATOR 2) joins the skinheads not for ideological or intellectual
reasons, but because he admires his brother and he wants to belong.
One night three black youths break into Derek's truck, which is exactly
what Derek has been waiting for. Outside in his shorts and his tattoo,
he shoots them all. The third would-be thief, unarmed, is only wounded.
In the key scene of the film, Derek commands the kid into a position
where he can be killed with one glorious, enraptured, awful stomp. (The
fun-spoiling NC-17 of ORGAZMO seems even more inappropriate, considering
AMERICAN HISTORY X was rated R. What sort of country is this that says
sex comedies are a bigger threat to our youth than brutal, ecstatic
violence?)
The police arrive just as Derek kills the last thief. Derek does not
resist the cops, and as they spin him around to cuff him, the film slows
down. Derek raises his eyebrows and smiles at his little brother in a
chilling, sadistic, satisfied grin.
Now in prison, Derek faces new challenges. As the black man in the
laundry tells him, "in the joint, you the nigra, not me." There is a
clique of swastika-wearing skinheads, but they are not interested in the
ideology of white supremacy. They only use the symbols as a means of
intimidation. Derek finds himself truly alone, truly in danger, and
truly afraid.
When Derek finally gets out of prison, he finds that his friends from
the gang have also changed. Without Derek's leadership, they have
shunned the white supremacist ideology for the white supremacist
culture. It is the final factor that makes him realize how badly he's
screwed up. In the end, he spends quality time with is brother trying to
undo the respect and admiration he had earlier inspired in Danny.
The film ends a little too deliberately, too neatly after the unchained
emotion and violent glee of the rest of the film, but it barely detracts
from the overall experience.
Edward Norton gives an Oscar-worthy performance. Although some of his
dialogue seemed to be written without enough conviction, Norton's
performance compensated. (An example that comes to mind is his pep talk
before looting the store.) He also captured the essence of an older
brother. He took his responsibility as a role model to his younger
brother very seriously, very lovingly, both before and after his change
of heart.
Though clearly not for all tastes, this film is bold and daring. The
subject matter is ugly, cruel, and at times hard to look at.
Nevertheless its subjects are part of humanity's great face. Kaye gives
us a good look at this fascinating, if distasteful, American subculture.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Matt Prigge
Director: Tony Kaye
Writer: David McKenna
Starring: Edward Norton, Edward Furlong, Avery Brooks, Fairuza Balk,
Beverly D'Angelo, Stacy Keach, Jennifer Lien, Ethan Suplee, Guy Torry,
Eliott Gould, William Russ, Paul Le Mat
It's tough to really say something nice about a type of person who's so
ethnocentric that any humanity they once had is now gone, but by god,
"American History X" does it, and for that, I commend it.  It not only
takes balls but intelligence to make a human being out of a neo-nazi
skinhead, a kind of person who dedicates their lives to hating anyone
who's not what they are, and this film wisely and miracurously pulls it
off.
The subject of this film is one of them, but he is worse than one of the
blind followers that make up most skinhead members since he is the
leader of the pack.  He's the one who instigates them to take a firm
grip onto their rage, and then in another brilliant stroke, justifies it
with political propoganda that makes eerie sense when he speaks.  He's
so utterly convincing as a public speaker and so firm in his convictions
that it comes as a shock when he actually goes through the
rehabilitation process.
His name is Derek Vinyard, and he's played by Edward Norton with so much
fire and intensity that when he speaks he's almost as convincing and
arresting a public speaker as, say, Malcom X.  When we first see him,
he's clean shaven, with a jet black swastica emrboidered on his left
breast, a devlish goatee, and he's attacking the black carjackers
outside of his house dressed in nothing but his white boxers and
carrying a handgun in his hand that never seems to run out of bullets,
at least when he doesn't need them.  He so believes in his convictions
that he's willing to put his beliefs to the test, even if he knows it
will mean a stop in prison, if only for a couple years.
"American History X" is about Derek, how he became a neo-nazi skinhead,
how he rose to power, how he was rehabilitated in prison after murdering
two black men in a fit of rage that was less to do with the stealing of
his car and more to do with proving himself, and how he tried to save
others, namely his younger brother, from making the same mistake.  We
see him at all of these stages - as a smart teenager, a vicious hate
monger, a man having an epiphany, and the man who tries to correct what
he's done before - and in all of these, we get a portrait of a man from
all sides.  Or at least, that's the intention.
The film's framing device is his brother, Danny (Edward Furlong,
perpetually looking about 13), also now a skinhead, and how his
principal, Bob Sweeney (Avery Brooks, who I just found out was or is the
captain on Star Trek's Deep Space 9), is trying to "correct" him.  When
the film opens, Danny has just written a book report on "Mein Kampf,"
landing him in trouble with Sweeney, which causes him to make him write
a paper on Derek's life and how it has gotten him nowhere.
Coincidentally, this day is the day Derek is released from prison, and
when we see him, he's cleaned-up, not as buff, and has a full head of
hair.  He's just as intelligent, but still very rough along the edges,
but he's wisened up.  He's no longer controlled by his anger at blacks
and jews, and tries to persuade Danny, who's becoming what Derek was
before, to give up his lifestyle.  But Danny won't.  He goes to a large
skinhead beer bash, meets with the skinhead leader (Stacy Keach), and
then discovers that Derek is as opposed to neo-nazi-dom as he was for it
a couple of years ago.
The film circles around this, then spins off into non-linear flashbacks,
all done in black and white.  We mostly see Derek at his prime as a
skinhead, living in Venice Beach, organizing vicious and quasi-sadistic
raids on local stores that no longer hire the white, middle-class
teenagers since they can easily get cheaper illegal immigrants to do the
same work, and mouthing off his theories on affirmative action and how
illegal immigrants and blacks have destroyed the fundamentals this
country was built on.  To them, the white man is the one who has gotten
the fuzzy end of the lolipop, and he not only speaks elloquently,
forcefully, and intelligently, but he backs everything up with political
reasons, justifying their rage at least to them.  And frighteningly
enough, much of what he says sounds true.
"American History X" is a collection of really great scenes and moments,
rather than a cohesive, great film that flows effortlessly from one
moment to the next.  In it, there are some of the best scenes I've seen
all year.  One scene features a dinner between Derek's family, and his
mother's newest boyfriend (played with reserve by Eliott Gould), a
jewish liberal who quietly disagrees with Derek's rightist views,
launching the scene into a fit of rage and anger that builds unparalled
emotions in the audience (Gould's reaction to Derek's final summation is
unnerrving).  Another scene uses humor and traditional macho sex talk to
build a friendship and a nice connection between Derek and a black
co-worker (Guy Torry) while folding laundry in prison.  And another
soon-to-be-classic is actually divided in two: the murder of the two
black men that winds Derek in jail, which contains a final murder so
nasty that it may be the most revoltingly shocking all year.
There's much more to appreciate, like the acting, which is uniformly
good, with stand-outs coming from Avery Brooks, Beverly D'Angelo (as the
long-suffering mother), and Gould (who has one horrible line, but other
than that, comes off with the best performance he's given in what seems
like a really long time).  Norton walks off with the film, though,
coming off with such intensity that he reduces anyone not doing an
adequate job to rubble.  In only the fifth movie of his career, Norton
has invented himself as one of the most reliable and intense actors of
his generation, and maybe the best.  There's nothing like it when Norton
really gets rolling in this movie, spewing out lines with such authority
that he commands all attention from the audience, coming off with power
similar to that of a young Maron Brando.  That he allows the little
emotions to seep through is amazing.
Sadly enough, this isn't going to be the great portrait of racism that
it perhaps hopes to be.  It's too unambitious and even a little
contrived to really take off as either a powerful statement or an
emotional masterpiece.  The ending, especially, is pencilled in from
other movies, tossed in just so the emotional keyboard can be trounced
upon.  Some of the skinheads are reduced to mere cliches (Kevin Smith
regular Ethan Suplee fairs rather annoyingly as the "Fat Skinhead,"
whose lines consist without fail of expressing his desire to eat more),
and even the dramatic arc isn't as well travelled.  Furlong's Danny
never seems to really be learning a lesson, since the flashbacks refuse
to show his point of view, and when he decides to make a change by the
end (which was inevitable), it doesn't seem like it has actually arrived
there.  Even Derek's descent into skinhead-dom doesn't seem justified.
Though his fireman father (William Russ, the dad from "Boy Meets World,"
and don't ask me how I know that) is killed by a black junkie, and even
before he spoke against affirmative action intelligently, there never
seems to be any real back story why Derek became so intense about his
beliefs.
As such, one can see why the director, Tony Kaye, wanted to have his
name removed.  Sorta.  "American History X" is a very good movie, and I
was very moved by it, but it could be a lot better, and the problem
seems to be that the cut as it is is not up to what he claims to be his
potential.  Somewhere, he claims, there lies a Tony Kaye cut, and that
was to be the true cut until it was viewed by Norton, who then ordered
another cut, and that is thus.  Although he aimed for the directing
credit to go to "Alan Smithee," the resident name for any film that is
to be disowned by its director, it wasn't allowed to him, under the
grounds that once you disown a film, you can not badmouth it (but
really, that's the MacGuffin - no one really wanted a film this good to
be given the Alan Smithee sign of disapproval).
Kaye's right in that it's not up to par, even if he's not referring to
normal par but rather his own personal par.  This will not be a "Do the
Right Thing" for the late 90s.  Yet it still gets its point across
intelligently, and backs it up with its story (its message, that one
cannot be so enwrapped in one's own beliefs or pain and suffering will
occur, is literally said over the narration, unfortunately).  And even
if it isn't perfect, at least when Avery Brooks turns to Norton after he
has been beaten and raped in prison, and asks him if anything he's done
has made his life any better, it realy hits a nerve, not only in Derek,
but also in the audience.

Author
David Sunga
Ingredients: neo-Nazi, redemption, legacy, family
Starring: Edward Norton, Edward Furlong
Synopsis:
When Venice Beach high school student Danny Vinyard (Edward Furlong)
becomes drawn to the neo-Nazi movement, the principal puts Danny in a
personal tutoring program whereby he must write about the life his older
brother Derek (Edward Norton), whom he idolizes. Through Danny's eyes,
AMERICAN HISTORY X tells the tale of how wayward brother Derek became
involved with the neo-Nazi movement, was sentenced to prison for a
shooting, served time, and faced the legacy of his mistakes.  
Opinion:
AMERICAN HISTORY X is a non-formula movie that approaches neo-Nazism
from a non-stereotypical view. It shows how seemingly average teens with
empty lives might get caught up in a racist social movement perpetrated
by demagogues with political ambitions.  Aside from redemption, another
central theme of AMERICAN HISTORY X is the concept of legacy. A man
might serve time in prison, but for both victims and aggressors, the
consequences of former actions continue. Although the pace of the film
somewhat uneven at times, and there is perhaps one unnecessary scene in
the last third of the movie, AMERICAN HISTORY X is an excellent family
drama that is well photographed and poignant as well as superbly acted.
Copyright Š 1998 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at 
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
Luke Buckmaster
AMERICAN HISTORY X
Cast: Edward Norton, Edward Furlong, Beverly D'Angelo, Avery Brooks,
Stacy Keach, Fairuza Balk, Jennifer Lien, Elliot Gould, Guy Torry, Ethan
Suplee, William Russ
Director: Tony Kaye
Australian theatrical release: May 6, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 stars
American History X is the story of one man's redemption in a world where
you can't dance with the devil and be left unscathed.   The film boasts
many meaningful - if not fascinating - social-political insights, but
one scene puts everything into perspective.  You'll know it if you see
it; it's a moment that is as moving and disturbing as Spike Lee at his
best.  Debut director Tony Kaye looks at a profound evil, making it
accessible through characters with radical but understandable views.
Labeling these characters as simply "Neo-Nazis" or "racists" doesn't
give them the depth they require.  In the case of American History X,
the two protagonists are people who have been dealt a rough hand in
life.  In no way does this excuse the sins of the past, but Kaye knows
that - and this unforgiving but sympathetic view on American society is
why American History X succeeds in packing a powerful emotional punch
when it goes in for the kill.
Derek Vineyard (Edward Norton) has just been released from prison after
serving a three-year sentence for killing two black men during an
attempted car theft. On the day of Derek's return, his younger brother
Danny (Edward Furlong) is assigned by his school principal (Avery
Brooks) to write a special essay on the events that led to his
incarceration.  Before his jail sentence, Derek was an eccentric
Neo-Nazi leader whose racist views were spawned after his father was
killed by a black man. Whilst serving time Derek became friends with a
black man, and slowly realized the error of his ways.  When he is back
on the streets his primary concern is to save Danny from following the
same ill-fated path as he.  But after taking a strong moral stance,
Derek's life is in jeopardy by vengeful African Americans and the group
of which he was once a leader.
Derek's drastic change in personality is surprisingly very believable,
thanks largely to Edward Norton's Academy Award nominated performance.
In 1996's Primal Fear, Norton brandished his character with an evil but
simultaneously sympathetic edge, and here he does a similar trick but on
a different level.  Norton projects a performance that is frightfully
realistic - unflinching and unrelenting, he's an actor that will have
you shifting in your seat.  Derek, as a character, is also frightfully
real.  The scariest thing about him is not the Neo-Nazism symbol
tattooed on his chest, nor his menacing shaved head appearance.  It is
that his racist views begin to make sense.  A passionate believer in
white supremacy, Derek is no Pauline Hanson - for every bit of fear he
generates through his appearance, an equal amount is matched through
what he says and how he says it.  At a time of emotional struggle, Derek
is asked a painful question: "has anything you've done made your life
better?"  He shakes his head whilst refraining from crying, knowing that
the path to redemption is much more difficult to walk down than the path
to evil.
Like the surprise hit Pleasantville, American History X slightly
sensationalizes and simplifies its themes so that all audiences can
respond to them.  For the most part it works well, but the film does
become sentimental in its final moments, and that's a notable mistake.
In a film about a cold and unforgiving world, why have a warm ending?
Perhaps this is what led Tony Kaye to publicly denounce the film,
stating that the final product did not reflect his original version.
Whilst one can only wonder what changes Kaye was upset about, American
History X is one of the finest American offerings so far this year.
Rather than opting for singular disturbing scenes or characters, the
film crafts a powerful and disquieting view on society in general.
Don't be put off by the title - American History X has universal
meaning.  It's a film that will linger in your mind and force you to
reevaluate the term "racism."


Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:  Tony Kaye
Cast:  Edward Norton, Edward Furlong, Fairuza Balk, Beverly D'Angelo,
Avery Brooks, Stacy Heach, Jennifer Lien, Elliott Gould
Screenplay:  David McKenna
Producers:  John Morrissey
Runtime:  117 min.
US Distribution:  New Line Cinema
Rated R:  Graphic brutal violence, sexuality, nudty, language
Apparently, director Tony Kaye had a major battle with New Line
regarding his new film, American History X.  I don't know the details of
the fight, but it seems that he is not happy with the final product, and
nearly removed his name from the credits altogether.  I've heard about
this kind of thing happening before, and it makes me wonder how much
input a studio has over the films they produce.  As it is, I found
American History X to be an extremely good film, not just because of
Tony Kaye's focused look at the touchy subject of racism, but because of
a powerful, charismatic performance from Edward Norton.
It's hard to believe that it has only been two years since Norton's
fantastic role in Primal Fear, but, here he is now, starring in his own
film and making himself a star.  Norton is one of those performers who
becomes his character, and his work in American History X is one of the
very best performances this year.  He plays a young man named Derek
Vinyard, a skinhead living in Venice Beach with his brother, Danny
(Edward Furlong), mother (Beverly D'Angelo), and sister, Davin (Jennifer
Lien).  The film opens with a flashback, in which Derek brutally kills
two black men vandalizing his car.  We find out that this lands him in
prison, and the film from that point is seen through the eyes of Danny.
In the present-time of the film, Danny is in high school, and eager to
follow the footsteps of his brother.  Much of the film is told in
flashback, and we see the path that leads to Derek's adoption of white
supremacy.  When Derek is released, having served three years in prison,
he finds that his brother is now a full-blown skinhead; Derek, however,
has given up the violence, and tries to get his brother to understand
why racism and the violence that comes with it are bad things.  What
makes this all interesting is that these two young men are not stupid,
thoughtless people -- they are intelligent and articulate, and voice
their beliefs in disturbingly straightforward terms.  
It's hard to make a Controversial movie and not preach, but Kaye has
found the right note for his material.  Because American History X is a
mainstream film, there has to be a redemption phase for our main
character -- some people may think that this is the only way to make him
sympathetic.  I partially disagree with this, because, although I do not
advocate racism in any way, it's interesting the way Kaye presents Derek
-- he is a loud, obnoxious man, but he's also very smart.  The reasons
for why he becomes a skinhead are believable -- his father was
arbitrarily killed by a group of black men.  It's clear that he's
passionate about his beliefs, and that he's not just a punk looking for
an excuse to beat people up.  
Of course, it helps that Kaye has an actor as talented as Norton to
play this part.  It's astonishing how frightening Norton looks with a
shaved head and a swastika on his chest.  In addition to getting the
look just right, he's perfect for this role -- Derek requires
intelligence, depth, and a whole lot of shouting, and Norton does it all
with ease.  Even when he's at his meanest, Derek has a likable quality
to him, and that's a gutsy approach when telling a story about a
skinhead.  What adds depth to the story is a subplot in which the
principal of Danny's school (Avery Brooks) becomes obsessed with purging
the hatred from Danny.  The other performances are all terrific, with
standouts from Furlong, D'Angelo, and Lien.  Visually, the film is very
powerful.  Kaye indulges in a lot of interesting artistic choices, and
most of them work nicely -- lots of slow-motion and strange camera
angles add to a moody atmosphere.
But, like a lot of movies lately, American History X skims past
greatness in the last few minutes.  Although the climactic scene is very
moving, the picture ends with a pretentious, preachy resolution
featuring a brief narration from a character who was killed.  For a
movie so smart a subtle up until that point, it felt like a slap in the
face to be hand-fed a theme in such a simplistic way.  It makes me
wonder what, exactly, Tony Kaye disliked about the final version of his
film.  Perhaps this last scene was the problem.  It's hard to imagine
any director not being at least partially pleased with a film this good
-- in a time when so many movies are timid and weak, American History X
manages to make a compelling argument for racism without advocating it
any way.    

Author
Dennis Schwartz
AMERICAN HISTORY X (director: Tony Kaye; screenwriter: David McKenna;
cinematographer: Tony Kaye; cast: Edward Norton (Derek), Edward Furlong
(Danny), Fairuza Balk (Stacey), Stacy Keach (Cameron), Avery Brooks
(Sweeney), Beverly D'Angelo (Doris), Jennifer Lien (Davina), Elliott
Gould (Murray), William Russ (Dennis, Derek's dad), Ethan Suplee (Seth),
Guy Torry (Lamont), 1998)
Racial hatred is something that we are not born with. It is a learned
response. "American History X" examines how two Los Angeles brothers
learn how to hate from their families, their communities, their schools,
their friends, and from a country that doesn't fulfill everyone's
expectations of it. Films of this nature are very difficult to do;
firstly, because they tend to become merely message vehicles and,
secondly, hatred is a mindset that must be unlearned and films tend to
think that they must sermonize to get their good intentions across and
sermons as a rule do not make for pleasing dramatics. When this film is
most effective, it goes for the jugular of its racist veins and pulls
back no punches, using lucid arguments about why there is racial
disharmony in this country and it does so in the language used on the
street. When it backtracks and feels that it has to explain itself and
sort of apologize for what it has shown, and allows the main character
off the racial hook rather abruptly, the story seems to weaken and
become somewhat artificial like so many other films of this ilk, afraid
to let completely go and allow the chips to fly where they may. What the
producers of the film might be afraid of, is that the message about why
youngsters become racists was too convincingly done, that their gripes
are too reasonable and might leave a bitter taste in the mouths of those
who can't face the realities of life in contemporary America. That this
is a country where so many of the nasty newspaper headlines seem to be
about racial problems; and, also, this is a country that is consumed by
its bad karma from its past racial history to its unsettling now and it
is thereby impossible to hide from these problems wherever one lives in
this country. But to live in an American city that has changed from
being an all-white one_to_ one with many blacks, seems to only
exasperate the racial problems. This film convincingly exploits this
racial tension, up to a point, as it tantalizes the audience with a
reality that is lived out for real in many of the viewer's everyday
lives, as many of them are the innocent ones caught in the cross-fire of
those extreme racists on both sides of the color line.
So one of the questions that crosses my mind, is what can this film add
to our knowledge of hatred that would make us feel we are onto some way
of dealing with it any better than we have until now? Perhaps it is an
unfair or an unanswerable question and not the purpose of any film to
do, but after seeing so much ugliness on screen, using gang violence,
race baiting attitudes, and the polarization of the races to make its
point about the current social crisis, it makes one wonder what is the
method to unlearning the hatred learned, especially when all the great
religious leaders and artists and philosophers could only reach those
who were convinced already that hatred was wrong and couldn't change the
world into an harmonious place, even if their message was an eloquent
and a correct one. I expect this film will actually be relished for its
provocative stance and its real sense of  hatred it was able to
duplicate in those white or black punks committing the violence, with
the extreme views of hatred outweighing any other message the film was
trying to deliver. And that is the beauty of the film; the real lesson
it puts on the table, the one that must be confronted; it is what makes
this film invaluable and genuine, a documentary-style look at racism.
In Britisher Tony Kaye's debut feature, after a successful career in
doing TV commercials, he brings some of the attention getting scenes
that commercials use to reach the consumer and has come up with a
riveting film that paints a necessary ugly racial picture in bold
black-and-white photography during some of its more graphically violent
scenes. But the director was not satisfied with the finished product,
claiming that the film's star, Edward Norton, re-edited the final
version giving himself more screentime and that the studio themselves
changed the film so that it could be more acceptable to a greater
audience. The film did have an incomplete look to it and its ending did
seem to be missing something, as there appeared to be holes in the story
and the film ended too abruptly to make sense. Nevertheless, the
director did a good job, this is a provocative film and it is one that
is grounded in reality and will be remembered for its powerful images of
hatred.
How do people feel when they see such changes for the worst in their
neighborhood and lump all people into stereotypes, is answered by Derek
Vinyard (Edward Norton); he joins a skinhead neo-Nazi group after the
last straw of his rationality is broken when his firefighter father
(Russ) is senselessly killed by a sniper in a black neighborhood while
putting out a fire in a crack house. We will learn later on through one
of the many flashbacks used, that his father taught the kid to have
these racists views, as we listen to them converse over dinner.
The story takes place in Venice Beach, and Derek tells us that blacks
and Hispanics have moved here recently from the ghettoes of L.A. and
have changed the fabric of the once peaceful community, by scaring the
white kids in school, bringing drugs and gangs into the area, and taking
over the basketball courts (there was a basketball game between the
skinheads and the black gang members over who will control the court
that seemed too facile to be that convincing).
"American History X " follows the life of the articulate rabble-rouser
Derek and his impressionable younger brother Danny (Edward Furlong), as
they try to find their real identities in life. For the past year after
his father's death, Derek has become a fanatical member of a neo-Nazi
gang which is influenced by a devious adult, Cameron Alexander (Keach),
who keeps in the background as he manipulates the boys with his sinister
hatred and gets the willing Derek to recruit and organize other
disenfranchised whites into the gang. Derek has many Nazi-type of
tattoos on his body, but the one that stands out like an emblazoned
emblem of holy sanctimony, is the giant swastika over his heart.
His mother (D'Angelo) is dating a liberal-minded Jewish teacher from the
local high school, Murray (Gould), and has invited him over for dinner,
and the family is discussing the Rodney King case, with the contrasting
views argued by Derek in a passionate manner as he is defending the
white cops while in a low key manner by Murray, who is appalled at the
police brutality shown against the black man. The rational part of their
argument comes to an end, as Derek's anti-Semitism is raised to a
feverish pitch at the sight of Murray sitting at the family table and
going out with his mother, and this causes a verbal barrage of hatred by
him directed at the befuddled school teacher, who is forced to leave the
house and end the budding relationship with Derek's mother.
That night while Derek is having sex with his neo-Nazi girlfriend Stacey
(Balk), Danny spots a black youth breaking into their van and alerts his
brother. Derek comes out with his automatic weapon and kills two of
them, with the third escaping. But the cops come to the scene and arrest
him in front of his house, in the most powerful scene of the film, he is
standing in his underwear, topless, with his swastika standing out in
the nighttime sky, as he feels so proud of what he has done, that he
raises his eyebrows and gives off with an obscene smirk like the good
neo-Nazi he has become under Cameron's tutelage. For this act, he
receives three- years in jail, and his life will drastically change, as
he learns the errors of his ways the hard way, reminescent of the old
familiar Western story of the gunman giving up his guns and returning to
town as a peacemaker.
In jail, prisoners cling together by race. Being white in prison means
you are in the minority, and as one of the black inmates, Lamont
(Torry), who reluctantly befriends the angry Derek on a laundry work
detail they share, as he tells him, "In here, you are the 'nigger'."
In order to be protected from the blacks who are out to get him, Derek
stays with the white power faction. But when the white leader rapes him
in the shower, he disses the group by refusing to sit with them at the
dining room. He was also disillusioned that his group didn't believe as
seriously as he did in the message about "white power" and made
political deals with the blacks and Hispanics. His protection is now
over and he is seen as a disheartened outcast. To his surprise, Lamont
puts out the word among the blacks to leave him alone and because of
this, Derek's racial feelings change and he can now look at blacks as
being human again, and so he decides that he can't go back to his
neo-Nazi gang again. This was the hardest part of the film to swallow
whole, especially when the change comes about so rapidly and the film
did not do a good enough job storywise of showing how this change could
be internally possible. What excelled though, was the acting, especially
by Norton, who understood his role and got the most out of it.
Meanwhile, back at school, Danny has Murray as his history teacher and
for homework writes a paper on Mein Kampf as an example of a great work
on civil rights, which upsets the teacher. The principal of the school,
a black man, Dr. Sweeney, has two doctorates-- he is depicted as being
twice as good as anyone in this film, and will be the bridge of sanity
for the film, working to help his students beyond the call of duty. He
was Derek's teacher and enjoyed having the bright student in class and
had visited him in jail, vouching for his early release from prison on
the condition he stops Danny from making the same mistakes he did. What
he decides to do for Danny, is to remove him from his history class and
take a new subject with him called American History X. As his first
assignment, he is to write a report about what led his brother to prison
and hand it in to him tomorrow. This 24-hour period will prove itself to
be eventful, because Derek gets released from prison and confronts the
skinheads telling them that he no longer will be in their organization.
This part of the story was too incredulous and sketchy for it to be
anything but a well-intentioned but misguided effort at making
everything turn out to be pat. Dr. Sweeney was also too sketchy a
characterization for the film to feel fluid. He seemed to be placed
there to provide the film with a safe way out of its difficult dilemma
it dug for itself regarding the extremity of race relations. But it was
just that extremity and its rawness that gave the film the kind of edge
to it that made it potent.
Danny has been under Cameron's influence while Derek did his time. He is
also being befriended by an overweight loser and fanatical neo-Nazi,
Seth (Suplee). The only character in the story that has the right energy
to counter the neo-Nazi influence on her hero-worshipping brother, is
his sister, Davina (Jennifer Lien). She is solid. Her anger and
impatience with the nonsense she is hearing is right on target. In her
small part- it's too bad she wasn't given more to say, she outshines the
arguments against hatred presented by her weak mother, the ineffective
Murray, and the too good to be real principal.
Another horrible scene to look at, is the flashback of the gang in
action, led by Derek, rampaging through a Korean grocery store wrecking
the place, violating the black lady cashier and humiliating the Koreans
by putting different food all over their faces and beating them-  scenes
like this are all done in black and white- it is only when Derek reforms
his ways when out of prison that the film becomes ready to be in
technicolor.
The most obvious flaw of the film, is that Derek's ultra right-wing
arguments against liberals and how the blacks are ruining the country,
never get answered back in a satisfactory way. There is no one to speak
up for what most people in America think is fair. And so when the tragic
ending to the film takes place, what is there to say! We have seen the
worst about America, how herd-like certain people can behave and how the
prison and the Venice Beach that is depicted both lump people into
groups because of race. But if this is the current reality, then there
are certainly alternative realities, where different human beings can
live together in peace, which the film tried to show through Dr.
Sweeney's presence, but that didn't work because his actions seemed too
contrived.
It is too bad that Derek couldn't see how rotten his ideas were in time,
maybe his intelligence wasn't all that it was cracked up to be. Or,
maybe someone like Cameron, whom he will eventually call a "chicken
hawk" because of his cowardly nature, was too good at preying on the
very vulnerable youngsters who need to belong to some hate group to
express themselves and that his mother was too enfeebled to raise him
properly, and there was no one else around to reach him. He didn't seem
like he was a criminal or the typical dumb skinhead type, but he seemed
as if he was someone who got confused over his bad ideas and didn't know
what else to do. In my opinion, the film didn't really capture the
mindset of the neo-Nazi wholly, it just peeked in on them and was
starting to zero in on their psyche and why they become skinheads and
what makes them exit from being one, but it ended up by just lumping
them together with all the other sterotyped groups and failed to go far
enough in showing us what makes them, in particular, tick. There just
seemed to be too much ground this film was trying to cover and it just
couldn't adequately cover the entire history of contemporary racism
without turning the film into a documentary.
But this is still a quality film, that is both visually powerful and
disturbing, showing how much dirt there is to bring up about America's
ever-present racial problems. I just wish the film didn't give us an
entire year's history curriculum about racism in two hours. If it didn't
back off from its characterization of Derek and Danny, and if it kept
hitting the sore points in society that ordinary people find hard to
talk about without getting overwrought or emotionally racial about, we
might have had a great film. The potential for this good film to be much
better than it was, was certainly there for the taking. And who can know
for sure if Tony Kaye is right about what he says ruined his film. I
guess all we can do is wait for his next film and see what he does with
that one before we can fully accept his argument for what went wrong
here, but let me praise him and the fine supporting cast for what was
right about the film, which was most of the film.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ
